Missouri, session 2026, SB1421.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Sections 27.020, 43.500, 43.530, 56.265,
2
195.417, 302.302, 304.070, 324.1100, 324.1102, 324.1103,
3
324.1105, 324.1116, 324.1134, 374.051, 374.695, 374.700,
4
374.702, 374.705, 374.710, 374.711, 374.715, 374.716, 374.717,
5
374.719, 374.720, 374.730, 374.740, 374.750, 374.755, 374.757,
6
374.759, 374.760, 374.763, 374.764, 374.770, 374.775, 374.783,
7
374.784, 374.785, 374.786, 374.787, 374.788, 374.789, 557.035,
8
569.086, 570.010, 571.030, 577.800, 579.022, 579.060, 579.065,
9
579.068, and 650.240, RSMo, are repealed and sixty-eight new
10
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
11
27.020, 43.500, 43.530, 56.265, 160.3300, 195.417, 210.1700,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

CCS SS SB 1421 2
12
301.287, 302.302, 304.070, 320.405, 324.1100, 324.1102,
13
324.1103, 324.1105, 324.1116, 324.1134, 324.2100, 324.2103,
14
324.2109, 324.2112, 324.2115, 324.2118, 324.2121, 324.2124,
15
324.2127, 324.2130, 324.2133, 324.2136, 324.2139, 324.2142,
16
324.2145, 324.2148, 324.2151, 324.2154, 324.2157, 324.2160,
17
324.2163, 324.2166, 324.2169, 324.2172, 324.2175, 324.2178,
18
324.2181, 324.2184, 324.2187, 374.051, 454.1050, 557.035,
19
565.097, 569.086, 569.117, 569.119, 570.010, 570.137, 571.030,
20
577.800, 579.022, 579.060, 579.065, 579.068, 589.900, 589.902,
21
590.1300, 610.141, 610.143, 610.144, and 650.240, to read as
22
follows:
1
27.020. 1. The attorney general is hereby authorized
2
to appoint s u ch a ssistant attorneys general as may be
3
necessary to properly perform the duties of his or her
4
office and shall fix the compensation of such assistants
5
within the limits of the amount appropriated by the general
6
assembly. Said assistant attorneys general shall hold their
7
office at the pleasure of the attorney general, shall
8
possess the same qualifications as the attorney general, and
9
before entering upon the discharge of their duties shall
10
each take and subscribe to an oath to support the
11
Constitution of the United States and of the state of
12
Missouri and to faithfully demean themselves in office. It
13
shall be their duty to assist the attorney general in h i s or
14
her official duties with power and authority under his or
15
her direction to represent him or her in the discharge of
16
all the duties of his or her office.
17
2. The attorney general may, at the request of any
18
officer , department, board, bureau, commission or agency of
19
the state, assign assistant attorneys general to perform the
20
duties prescribed by law before or upon behalf of such
21
officer, department, board, bureau, commission or agency and

CCS SS SB 1421 3
22
may, upon request as aforesaid, from time to time reassign
23
such assistants.
24
3. The attorney general is also authorized to appoint
25
a chief clerk, stenographers, typists, clerks,
26
[investigators] and such other employees as shall be
27
necessary to properly perform the duties of his or her
28
office [and shall fix the compensation of persons thus
29
employed within the limits of the amount appropriated by the
30
general assembly]. Said employees shall serve during the
31
pleasure of the at t orney general. [The assistant attorneys
32
general and the chief clerk, sten o graphers, typists, clerks,
33
investigators and other employees shall be paid in the same
34
manner and at the same time as the attorney general. The
35
compensation and expenses of said assistants and emp l oyees
36
may be paid out of any state or federal funds appropriated
37
to said department for such purposes.]
38
4. The attorney general is further authorized to
39
appoint commissioned and noncommissioned investigators, as
40
shall be necessary to properly perform the duties of his or
41
her office. Investigators shall serve at the pleasure of
42
the attorney general. Each commissioned investigator, upon
43
appointment, shall tak e and subscribe an oath of office to
44
support the constitution and laws of the United States and
45
the state of Missouri and shall receive a certificate of
46
appointment, a copy of which shall be filed with the
47
secretary of state, issued by the attorney general or his or
48
her designee granting such commissioned investigator all the
49
same powers of arrest held by peace officers to maintain
50
order and preserve the peace in any matter in which the
51
attorney general is appointed or assigned in accordance with
52
the law. Commissioned investigators may assist law
53
enforcem e nt agencies when requested. The certificate of

CCS SS SB 1421 4
54
appointment of each commissioned investigator may be
55
withdrawn at any time by the attorney general. Commissioned
56
investigators shall comply with all peace offi c er standards
57
required by chapter 590.
58
5. The attorney general is authorized to fix the
59
compens a tion of persons employed by him or her within the
60
limits of the amount appropriated by the general assembly.
61
The assistant attorneys general and the chief clerk,
62
stenographers, typists, clerks, investigators, and other
63
employees shall be paid in the same manner and at the same
64
time as the attorney general. The compensation and expenses
65
of said assistants, investiga t ors, and other employees may
66
be paid out of any state or federal funds appropriated to
67
said department for such purposes.
1
43.500. As used in sections 43.500 to 43.651, the
2
following te r ms mean:
3
(1) "Administration of criminal justice", performance
4
of any o f the following activities: detection,
5
apprehension, detention, pretrial r e lease, post-trial
6
release, prosecution, adjudication, correctional
7
supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or
8
criminal offenders. The administration of criminal justice
9
shall include the d i scretion to disclose closed mobile video
10
recordings. Such discretion shall belong solely to the
11
agency creat ing the video and shall not waive closure rights
12
or requirements for subsequent requests. The administration
13
of criminal justice shall include the sc r eening of employees
14
or applicants seeking employment with criminal justice
15
agencies, criminal identification activities, and the
16
collection, storage, and dissemination of criminal history
17
information, including fingerprint searches, photographs,
18
and other unique biometric identification;

CCS SS SB 1421 5
19
(2) "Central repository", the division within the
20
Missouri state highway patrol responsible for compiling and
21
disseminating complete and accurate criminal history records
22
and statistics;
23
(3) "Committee", criminal records and justice
24
informat i on advisory committee;
25
(4) "Comparable ordinance violation", a violation of
26
an ordin a nce having all the essential elements of a
27
statutory felony or a class A misdemeanor;
28
(5) "Criminal history record information", information
29
collecte d by criminal justice agencies on individuals
30
consisting of identifiable descriptions and notations of
31
arrests, detentions, indictments, informations, or other
32
formal criminal charges, and any disposition arising
33
therefrom, sentencing, correctional supervision, and release;
34
(6) "Final disposition", the formal conclusion of a
35
criminal proceeding at whatever stage it occurs in the
36
criminal justice system;
37
(7) "Missouri charge code", a unique number assigned
38
by the o f fice of state courts administrator to an offense
39
for tracking and grouping offenses. Beginning January 1,
40
2005, the complete charge code shal l consist of digits
41
assigned by the office of state courts administrator, the
42
two-digit national crime information center modifiers and a
43
single digit designating attempt, accessory, or conspiracy.
44
The only exception to the January 1, 2005, date shall be th e
45
courts that are not using the statewide court automation
46
case management pursuant to section 476.055; the effective
47
date will be as soon thereafter as economically feasible for
48
all other courts;
49
(8) "State offense cycle number", a unique number,
50
supplied by or approved by the Missouri state highway

CCS SS SB 1421 6
51
patrol, on the state criminal fingerprint card. The offense
52
cycle number, OCN, is used to link the identity of a person,
53
through unique biometric identification, to one or many
54
offenses for which the person is arrested or charged. The
55
OCN will be used to track an offense incident from th e date
56
of arrest to the final disposition when the offender exits
57
from the criminal justice system;
58
(9) "Unique biometric identification", automated
59
methods o f recognizing and identifying an individual based
60
on a physiological characteristic. Biometric identification
61
methods may include but are not lim ited to facial
62
recognition, fingerprints, palm prints, hand geometry, iris
63
recognition, and retinal scan.
1
43.530. 1. For each request requiring the payment of
2
a fee receiv e d b y the central repository, the requesting
3
entity shall pay a fee of not more than nine dollars per
4
request for criminal history record information not based on
5
a fingerprint search. In each year beginning on or after
6
January 1, 2010, the s uperintendent may increase the fee
7
paid by requesting entities by an amount not to exceed one
8
dollar per year, however, under no circumstance shall the
9
fee paid by requesting entities exceed [fifteen] twenty
10
dollars per request.
11
2. For each request requiring the payment of a fee
12
receive d by the central repository, the requesting entity
13
shall pay a fee of not more than twenty dollars per request
14
for criminal history record information based on a
15
fingerprint search, unless the request is required under the
16
provisions of subdivision (6) of section 210.481, section
17
210.487, or section 571.101, in which case the fee shall be
18
fourteen dollars.

CCS SS SB 1421 7
19
3. Upon establishment of a fingerprinting system
20
within t he central repository, the superintendent shall
21
collect the current vendor fee for device usage by
22
requestors under this section. When initially established,
23
the fee shall not exceed the v e ndor fee then in place for
24
legacy livescan devices under state contract. Thereafter
25
the superintendent may increase the fee by no more than
26
fifty cents per year. The fee shall be deposited to the
27
criminal record system fund.
28
4. A request made under subsections 1 and 2 of this
29
section shall be limited to check and search on one
30
individual. Each request shall be accompanied by a check,
31
warrant, vou cher, money order, or electronic payment payable
32
to the state of Missouri-criminal record system or payment
33
shall be made in a manner approved by the highway patrol.
34
The highway patrol may establish procedures for receiving
35
requests for criminal history record information for
36
classification and search for fingerprints, from courts and
37
other entities, and for the payment of such requests. There
38
is hereby established by the treasurer of the state o f
39
Missouri a fund to be entitled as the "Criminal Record
40
System Fund". Notwithstanding the provisions of section
41
33.080 to the contrary, if the moneys collected and
42
deposited into this fund are not totally expended annually
43
for the purposes set forth in sections 43.500 to 43.651, the
44
unexpended moneys in such fund shall remain in the fund and
45
the balance shall be kept in the fund to accumulate from
46
year to year.
1
56.265. 1. The county prosecuting attorney in any
2
county[, oth e r t h an in a chartered county,] shall receive an
3
annual salary computed [using the following schedule, when
4
applicable. The assessed valuation factor shall be the

CCS SS SB 1421 8
5
amount thereof as shown for the year immediately preceding
6
the year for which the computation is done] as provided in
7
this subsection.
8
(1) For a full-time [prosecutor] prosecuting attorney
9
of a cha r ter, first, or second class county, or of a city
10
not within a county, the [prosecutor] prosecuting attorney
11
shall receive compensation equal to one hundred percent of
12
the compensation of [an associate] a circuit judge[;].
13
(2) [For a part-time prosecutor:] For a full-time
14
prosecut i ng attorney of a third or fourth class county, the
15
prosecuting attorney shall receive compensation equal to one
16
hundred percent of the compensation of an associate circuit
17
judge or, upon approval by a majority of the county
18
commission, the prosecuting attorney shall receive
19
compensation equal to ninety-five percent of the
20
compensation of a circuit judge.
21
[Assessed Valuation Amount
22
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $37,000
23
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 38,000
24
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 39,000
25
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 41,000
26
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 43,000
27
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 45,000
28
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 47,000
29
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 49,000
30
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 51,000

CCS SS SB 1421 9
31
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 53,000
32
300,000,000 or more 55,000]
33
(3) Upon approval by a majority of the county
34
commissi o n, a part-time prosecuting attorney shall receive
35
compensation equal to between thirty and sixty percent of
36
the compensation of an associate circuit judge.
37
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
38
section t o the contrary, no prosecuting attorney who has
39
held the office of prosecuting attorney prior to January 1,
40
2027, shall have their compensation lowered by the
41
implementation of the compensation procedures of this
42
section, nor shall any prosecuting attorney have their
43
compensation lowered during their tenure of office.
44
2. Two thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable
45
to any p rosecuting attorney only if the prosecuting attorney
46
has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction
47
each calendar year relating to the operations of the
48
prosecuting attorney's office when approved by a
49
professional association of the county prosecuting attorneys
50
of Missouri unless exempted from the training by the
51
professional association. The professional association
52
approving the program sha l l provide a certificate of
53
completion to each prosecuting attorney who completes the
54
training program and shall send a list of certified
55
prosecuting attorneys to the treasurer of each county or
56
city not within a county. Expenses incurred for attending
57
the training session may b e reimbursed to the prosecuting
58
attorney in the same manner as other expenses as may be
59
appropriated for that purpose.

CCS SS SB 1421 10
60
3. Each calendar year, five thousand dollars of the
61
salary s hall be payable to any prosecuting attorney only if
62
the prosecuting attorney has collected the data described in
63
subsection 2 of section 56.750 in a manner approved by the
64
prosecutors coordinators training council and makes the data
65
described in subsection 2 of section 56.750 readily
66
accessible to the Missouri office of prosecution services.
67
The Missouri office of prosecution services shall provide a
68
certificate of compliance to each prosecuting attorney who
69
complies with this subsection and shall send a list of any
70
certified prosecuting attorney to the respective treasurer
71
of each county or city not within a county.
72
4. For each calendar year, three thousand dollars of
73
the sal a ry shall be payable to any prosecuting attorney only
74
if the prosecuting attorney has provided discovery to
75
criminal defense attorneys who have entered an appearance on
76
behalf of a defendant in a manner approved by the
77
prosecutors coordinators training council. The Missouri
78
office of prosecution services shall provi d e a certificate
79
of compliance to each prosecuting attorney who complies with
80
this subsection and shall send a list of any certified
81
prosecuting attorney to the respective treasurer of each
82
county or city not within a county.
83
5. As used in this section, the term "prosecuting
84
attorne y " includes the circuit attorney of any city not
85
within a county.
86
6. The prosecuting attorney of any county which
87
becomes a county of the first classification during a four-
88
year term of office or a county which passed the proposition
89
authorized by subsection 1 of section 56.363 shall not be
90
required to devote full time to such office pursuant to
91
section 56.067 until the beginning of the prosecuting

CCS SS SB 1421 11
92
attorney's next term of office or until the proposition
93
otherwise becomes effective.
94
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
95
contrar y , any county with a vacancy in the office of
96
prosecuting attorney for more than sixty days may
97
consolidate with one contiguous county with a sitting
98
prosecuting attorney upon a unanimous vote of the county
99
commissions of such counties to establish a cooperative
100
regional prosecuting attorney's office at any time. The
101
prosecuting attorney of the contiguous county shall then
102
become the prosecuting attorney of that region for the
103
remainder of that prosecuting attorney's term of office or
104
until such time as the governor appoints a prosecuting
105
attorney to fill the vacant prosecuting attorney position
106
pursuant to section 105.030. Regional prosecuting attorneys
107
shall be designated as full- t ime prosecuting attorneys and
108
shall be compensated in the manner provided under the
109
provisions of subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this
110
section. No two counties that each have sitting prosecuting
111
attorney s shall be permitted to consolidate in the manner
112
described in this section.
113
8. The provisions of section 56.066 shall not apply to
114
full-ti m e prosecutors who are compensated pursuant to
115
subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section.
116
9. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
117
the "Mi s sour i State Prosecutorial Services Grant Fund",
118
which shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general
119
assembly.
120
(2) The state treasurer shall be custodian of the
121
fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the
122
state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall
123
be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriatio n , moneys in this

CCS SS SB 1421 12
124
fund shall be used solely as provided in this section and
125
shall be allocated to counties of the third and fourth
126
classification on the basis of need in order for such
127
counties to be in compliance with the prosecuting attorney
128
compensation provisions of this section.
129
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
130
to the c o ntrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
131
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
132
general revenue fund.
133
(4) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
134
fund in t he same manner as other funds are invested. Any
135
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
136
credited to the fund.
1
160.3300. 1. School districts may install and operate
2
school bus safe ty c ameras on school buses to be used for the
3
detection of violations of section 304.050, provided that
4
such use is approved by a vote of the school district board
5
of directors. Any image or video recorded by a school bus
6
safety camera that is not used for the purpose of enforcing
7
violations of section 304.050 shall be permanently deleted
8
no later than one hundred eighty days from the date of
9
capture. For purposes of this section, "school bus safety
10
camera" m eans a device that is affixed to a school bus that
11
records photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images
12
of the front or rear of a vehicle at the time the vehicle is
13
detected for an infraction identified in section 304.050.
14
2. No image or video captured by a school bus safety
15
camera a uthorized under this section shall be used by a
16
political subdivision for violation detection or enforcement
17
as part of any automated camera system designed to detect
18
traffic violations and issue citations. Nothing in this
19
section shall prohibit a prosecutor fro m introducing any

CCS SS SB 1421 13
20
image or video captured by a school bus safety camera as
21
evidence in a judicial proceeding.
1
195.417. 1. The limits specified in this section
2
shall not app l y t o any quantity of such product, mixture, or
3
preparation which must be dispensed, sold, or distributed in
4
a pharmacy pursuant to a valid prescription.
5
2. Within any thirty-day period, no person shall sell,
6
dispens e , or otherwise provide to the same individual, and
7
no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire more
8
than the following amount: any number of packages of any
9
drug product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
10
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
11
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers,
12
either as:
13
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
14
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination
15
drug; or
16
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in
17
subdivis i ons (1) and (2) of this subsection;
18
in any total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams,
19
without regard to the number of transactions.
20
3. Within any twenty-four-hour period, no pharmacist,
21
intern p harmacist, or registered pharmacy technician shall
22
sell, dispense, or otherwise provide to the same individual,
23
and no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire
24
more than the following amount: any number of packages of
25
any drug product containing any detectable amount of
26
ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any
27
of their salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical
28
isomers, either as:
29
(1) The sole active ingredient; or

CCS SS SB 1421 14
30
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination
31
drug; or
32
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in
33
subdivis i ons (1) and (2) of this subsection;
34
in any total amount greater than three and six-tenths grams
35
without regard to the number of transactions.
36
4. Within any twelve-month period, no person shall
37
sell, d i spense, or otherwise provide to the same individual,
38
and no person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire
39
more than the following amount: any number of packages of
40
any drug product containing any detectable amount of
41
ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any
42
of their salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical
43
isomers, either as:
44
(1) The sole active ingredient; or
45
(2) One of the active ingredients of a combination
46
drug; or
47
(3) A combination of any of the products specified in
48
subdivis i ons (1) and (2) of this subsection;
49
in any total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and
50
two-tenths grams, without regard to the number of
51
transactions.
52
5. All packages of any compound, mixture, or
53
prepara t ion containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
54
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
55
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers,
56
except those that are excluded from Schedule V in subsection
57
17 or 18 of section 195.017, shall be offered for sale only
58
from behind a pharmacy counter where the public is not

CCS SS SB 1421 15
59
permitted, and only by a registered pharmacist or registered
60
pharmacy technician under section 195.017.
61
6. Each pharmacy shall submit information regarding
62
sales o f any compound, mixture, or preparation as specified
63
in this section in accordance with transmission methods and
64
frequency established by the department by regulation.
65
7. (1) As used in this subsection, "administrator of
66
the rea l -tim e electronic pseudoephedrine tracking system"
67
means the entity responsible for developing, implementing,
68
and maintaining the data collection system described in 19
69
CSR 30-1.074 or any successor regulation.
70
(2) Beginning October 1, 2026, and continuing
71
thereaft e r, any manufacturer of any compound, mixture, or
72
preparation specified in this section that is sold in or
73
into the state shall, on a monthly basis, pay fees to the
74
administrator of the real-time electronic pseudoephedrine
75
tracking system.
76
(3) The administrator of the real-time electronic
77
pseudoep h edrine tracking system shall be responsible for
78
setting the fee levels required under this subsection.
79
(4) Upon the request of the department of health and
80
senior s e rvices, any manufacturer required to pay fees under
81
this subsection shall provide written documentation
82
demonstrating that the manufacturer has paid such fees.
83
(5) The fees required under this subsection shall be
84
assessed against each manufacturer solely on the basis of
85
sales transactions involving that manufacturer's own
86
compounds, mixtures, or preparations sold in or into the
87
state. No manufacturer shall be assessed fees based upon
88
transa c tions attributable to the compounds, mixtures, or
89
preparations of any other manufacturer.

CCS SS SB 1421 16
90
8. No prescription shall be required for the
91
dispens a tion, sale, or distribution of any drug product
92
containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
93
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
94
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in an
95
amount within the limits described in subsections 2, 3, and
96
4 of this section. The superintendent of the Missouri state
97
highway patrol shall report to the revisor of statutes and
98
the general assembly by February first when the statewide
99
number of methamphetamine laboratory seizure incidents
100
exceeds three hundred incidents in the previous calendar
101
year. The provisions of this subsection shall expire on
102
April first of the calendar year in which the revisor of
103
statutes receives such notification.
104
[8.] 9. This section shall supersede and preempt any
105
local ord ina n ces or regulations, including any ordinances or
106
regulations enacted by any political subdivision of the
107
state. This section shall not apply to the sale of any
108
animal feed products containing ephedrine or any naturally
109
occurring or herbal ephedra or extract of ephedra.
110
[9.] 10. Any local ordinances or regulations enacted
111
by any po liti c al subdivision of the state prior to August
112
28, 2020, requiring a prescription for the dispensation,
113
sale, or distribution of any drug product containing any
114
detectable amount of ephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or
115
pseudoephedrine, or any of their salts or optical isomers,
116
or salts of optical isomers, in an amount within the limits
117
described in subsections 2, 3, and 4 of this section shall
118
be void and of no effect and no such political subdivision
119
shall maintain or enforce such ordinance or regulation.
120
[10.] 11. All logs, records, documents, and electronic
121
informatio n ma i ntained for the dispensing of these products

CCS SS SB 1421 17
122
shall be open for inspection and copying by municipal,
123
county, and state or federal law enforcement officers whose
124
duty it is to enforce the controlled substances laws of this
125
state or the United States.
126
[11.] 12. All persons who dispense or offer for sale
127
pseudoephe drin e and ephedrine products, except those that
128
are excluded from Schedule V in subsection 17 or 18 of
129
section 195.017, shall ensure that all such products are
130
located only behind a pharmacy counter where the public is
131
not permitted.
132
[12.] 13. The penalty for a knowing or reckless
133
violation of t h is section is found in section 579.060.
1
210.1700. 1. As used in this section, the following
2
terms mean:
3
(1) "Overnight camp", a program operated by a person
4
or organ i zation that includes the hours between 9:00 p.m.
5
and 6:00 a.m. but not for two or more sequential overnights;
6
(2) "Residential camp", a program operated by a person
7
or organ i zation that includes the hours between 9:00 p.m.
8
and 6:00 a.m. for two or more sequential overnights.
9
2. Each overnight camp or residential camp staff
10
member o r volunteer who is eighteen years of age or older
11
shall have received a qualifying criminal background check
12
as defined in 210.1080.
1
301.287. 1. This section shall be known and referred
2
to as "Mason' s La w ".
3
2. Beginning January 1, 2027, a resident of this state
4
with a h ealth condition or disability that limits or impairs
5
the ability to effectively communicate with law enforcement
6
may, at any time, apply to the department of revenue for a
7
designation that shall be associated with the person's
8
driver's license issued under chapter 302 and motor vehicle

CCS SS SB 1421 18
9
license plate or plates issued under this chapter and
10
available to law enforcement under the Missouri uniform law
11
enforcement system (MULES) established under chapter 43.
12
3. The initial application, which shall be on a form
13
prescri b ed by the department and made available on the
14
department's website, shall by signed by a physician
15
licensed under chapter 334, or a psychologist licensed under
16
chapter 337, certifying that:
17
(1) The applicant or the applicant's child, parent, or
18
spouse h a s a physical or mental health condition that is
19
likely to impair the ability to effectively communicate with
20
law enforcement; and
21
(2) The physician or psychologist has determined that
22
the appl i cant or the applicant's child, parent, or spouse
23
will have the communication impairment for at least five
24
years.
25
4. Upon submission of an application and approval by
26
the dep a rtment, the department shall prepare an entry in the
27
department's records that is accessible to law enforcement
28
via MULES and that indicates that the applicant or the
29
applicant's child, parent, or spouse has a physical or
30
mental health condition that may impair the ability to
31
effectively communicate with law enforcement. Such entry as
32
related to the applicant's driver's license s h all remain
33
active until the expiration of their driver's license. Such
34
entry as related to the applicant's motor vehicle lice n se
35
plate or plates shall remain active for a period of five
36
years, unless the applicant requests that such designation
37
be removed from the records. Upon expiration of the five-
38
year period, the designation in MULES may be reactivated
39
upon the filing of a renewal form with the department signed

CCS SS SB 1421 19
40
by a physician licensed under chapter 334, or a psychologist
41
licensed under chapter 337, certifying that:
42
(1) The applicant or the applicant's child, parent, or
43
spouse h a s a physical or mental health condition that is
44
likely to impair the ability to effectively communicate with
45
law enforcement; and
46
(2) The physician or psychologist has determined that
47
the appl i cant or the applicant's child, parent, or spouse
48
will have the communication impairment for at least five
49
years.
50
5. The department of public safety shall issue
51
guidanc e and education materials to all law enforcement
52
agencies in this state to promote awareness of the
53
designation established under this section.
54
6. The department of revenue may promulgate all
55
necessa r y rules and regulations for the administration of
56
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term
57
is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
58
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
59
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
60
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
61
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
62
if any o f the powers vested with the general assembly
63
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
64
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
65
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
66
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
67
2026, shall be invalid and void.
1
302.302. 1. The director of revenue shall put into
2
effect a poin t sy s tem for the suspension and revocation of
3
licenses. Points shall be assessed only after a conviction

CCS SS SB 1421 20
4
or forfeiture of collateral. The initial point value is as
5
follows:
6
(1) Any moving violation of a state law 2 points
7
or county or municipal or federal
8
traffic ordinance or regulation not
9
listed in this section, other than a
10
violation of vehicle equipment
11
provisions or a court-ordered
12
supervision as provided in section
13
302.303
14
(except any violation of municipal 1 point)
15
stop sign ordinance where no accident
16
is involved
17
(2) Speeding
18
In violation of a state law 3 points
19
In violation of a county or municipal 2 points
20
ordinance
21
(3) Leaving the scene of an accident in 12 points
22
violation of section 577.060
23
In violation of any county or 6 points
24
municipal ordinance
25
(4) Careless and imprudent driving in 4 points
26
violation of subsection 4 of section
27
304.016
28
In violation of a county or municipal 2 points
29
ordinance
30
(5) Operating without a valid license in
31
violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of
32
subsection 1 of section 302.020:
33
(a) For the first conviction 2 points

CCS SS SB 1421 21
34
(b) For the second conviction 4 points
35
(c) For the third conviction 6 points
36
(6) Operating with a suspended or revoked 12 points
37
license prior to restoration of
38
operating privileges
39
(7) Obtaining a license by 12 points
40
misrepresentation
41
(8) For the first conviction of driving 8 points
42
while in an intoxicated condition or
43
under the influence of controlled
44
substances or drugs
45
(9) For the second or subsequent 12 points
46
conviction of any of the following
47
offenses however combined: driving
48
while in an intoxicated condition,
49
driving under the influence of
50
controlled substances or drugs or
51
driving with a blood alcohol content
52
of eight-hundredths of one percent or
53
more by weight
54
(10) For the first conviction for driving
55
with blood alcohol content eight-
56
hundredths of one percent or more by
57
weight
58
In violation of state law 8 points
59
In violation of a county or municipal 8 points
60
ordinance or federal law or
61
regulation
62
(11) Any felony involving the use of a 12 points
63
motor vehicle
64
(12) Knowingly permitting unlicensed 4 points
65
operator to operate a motor vehicle

CCS SS SB 1421 22
66
(13) For a conviction for failure to 4 points
67
maintain financial responsibility
68
pursuant to county or municipal
69
ordinance or pursuant to section
70
303.025
71
(14) Endangerment of a highway worker in 4 points
72
violation of section 304.585
73
(15) Aggravated endangerment of a highway 12 points
74
worker in violation of section
75
304.585
76
(16) For a conviction of violating a 4 points
77
municipal ordinance that prohibits tow
78
truck operators from stopping at or
79
proceeding to the scene of an accident
80
unless they have been requested to
81
stop or proceed to such scene by a
82
party involved in such accident or
83
by an officer of a public safety
84
agency
85
(17) Endangerment of an emergency 4 points
86
responder in violation of section
87
304.894
88
(18) Aggravated endangerment of an 12 points
89
emergency responder in violation of
90
section 304.894
91
(19) Failure to stop for a school bus that 5 points
92
is receiving or discharging students,
93
in violation of subsection 1 of
94
section 304.050
95
2. The director shall, as provided in subdivision (5)
96
of subs e ction 1 of this section, assess an operator points
97
for a conviction pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of
98
subsection 1 of section 302.020, when the director issues

CCS SS SB 1421 23
99
such operator a license or permit pursuant to the provisions
100
of sections 302.010 to 302.340.
101
3. An additional two points shall be assessed when
102
persona l injury or property damage results from any
103
violation listed in subdivisions (1) to (13) of subsection 1
104
of this section and if found to be warranted and certified
105
by the reporting court.
106
4. When any of the acts listed in subdivision (2),
107
(3), (4 ) or (8) of subsection 1 of this section constitutes
108
both a violation of a state law and a violation of a county
109
or municipal ordinance, points may be assessed for either
110
violation but not for both. Notwithstanding that an offense
111
arising out of the same occ u rrence could be construed to be
112
a violation of subdivisions (8), (9) and (10) of subsection
113
1 of this section, no person shall be tried or convicted for
114
more than one offense pursuant to subdivisions (8), (9) and
115
(10) of subsection 1 of this section for offenses arising
116
out of the same occurrence.
117
5. The director of revenue shall put into effect a
118
system f or staying the assessment of points against an
119
operator. The system shall provide that the satisfactory
120
completio n of a driver-improvement program or, in the case
121
of violations committed while operating a motorcycle, a
122
motorcycle-rider training course approved by the state
123
highways and transportation commission, by an operator, when
124
so ordered and verified by any court having jurisdiction
125
over any law of this state or county or municipal ordinance,
126
regulating motor vehicles, other than a violation committed
127
in a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 302.700
128
or a violation committed by an individual who has been
129
issued a commercial driver's license or is required to
130
obtain a commercial driver's license in this state or any

CCS SS SB 1421 24
131
other state, shall be accepted by the director in lieu of
132
the assessment of points for a violation pursuant to
133
subdivision (1), (2) or (4) of subsection 1 of this section
134
or pursuant to subsection 3 of this section. The operator
135
shall be given the option to complete the dri ver-improvement
136
program through an online or in-person course. A court
137
using a centralized violation bureau establish e d under
138
section 476.385 may elect to have the bureau order and
139
verify completion of a driver-improvement program or
140
motorcycle-rider training course as prescribed by order of
141
the court. For the purposes of this subsection, the driver-
142
improvemen t program shall meet or exceed the standards of
143
the National Safety Council's eight-hour "Defensive Driving
144
Course" or, in the case of a violation which occurred during
145
the operation of a motorcycle, the program shall meet the
146
standards established by the state highways and
147
transportation commission pursuant to sections 302.133 to
148
302.137. The completion of a driver-improvement program or
149
a motorc y cle-rider training course shall not be accepted in
150
lieu of points more than one time in any thirty-six-month
151
period and shall be completed within sixty days of the date
152
of conviction in order to be accepted in lieu of the
153
assessment of points. Every court having jurisdiction
154
pursuant to the provi s ions of this subsection shall, within
155
fifteen days after completion of the driver-improvement
156
program or motorcycle-rider training course by an operator,
157
forward a record of the completion to the director, all
158
other provisions of the law to the contrary
159
notwithstanding. The director shall establish procedures
160
for record keepi n g and the administration of this subsection.
1
304.070. 1. Any person who violates any of the
2
provisions of sub s ections 1, 3, and 7 of section 304.050 is

CCS SS SB 1421 25
3
guilty of a class A misdemeanor. [In addition, the court
4
may suspend the driver's license of any person who violates
5
the provision of subsection 1 of section 304.050. If
6
ordered by the court, the director shall suspend t he
7
driver's license for ninety days for a first offense of
8
subsection 1 of section 304.050, and one hundred twenty days
9
for a second or subsequent offense of subsection 1 of
10
section 304.050.] Any person who violates subsection 1 of
11
section 304.050 wh ere such violation results in the physical
12
injury of any child shall be guilty of a class E felony.
13
Any person who violates subsection 1 of section 304.050
14
where such violation causes the serious physical injury or
15
death of any child shall be guilty of a class D felony. For
16
the purposes of this subsection, "physical injury" mean s
17
physical pain, illness, or any impairment of physical
18
condition including, but not limited to, bruising,
19
lacerations, hematomas, welts, or permanent or temporary
20
disfigurement and impairment of any bodily function or
21
organ. The term "serious physical injury" means a physical
22
injury that creates a substantial risk of death or that
23
causes serious disfigurement or protracted loss or
24
impairment of the function of any part of the body.
25
2. [Any appeal of a suspension imposed under
26
subsect i on 1 of this section shall be a direct appeal of the
27
court order and subject to review by the presiding judge of
28
the circuit court or another judge within the circuit other
29
than the judge who issued the original order to suspend the
30
driver's license. The director of revenue's entry of the
31
court-ordered sus p ension on the driving record is not a
32
decision subject to review pursuant to section 302.311. Any
33
suspension of the driver's license ordered by the court
34
under this section shall be in addition to any other

CCS SS SB 1421 26
35
suspension that may occur as a result of the conviction
36
pursuant to other provisions of law] Notwithstanding any
37
other provision of law to the contrary, any person found
38
guilty of a violation of subsection 1 of section 304.050
39
shall be subject to the following fines:
40
(1) For a first offense, a fine of at least five
41
hundred d ollars but not more than one thousand dollars;
42
(2) For a second offense within a five-year period, a
43
fine of a t least one thousand dollars but not more than two
44
thousand dollars; and
45
(3) For a third or subsequent offense within a five-
46
year per i od, a fine of at least one thousand five hundred
47
dollars but not more than three thousand dollars.
48
No court shall suspend any portion of the fines established
49
un der th is sub section.
50
3. No violation of subsection 1 of section 304.050
51
shall b e disposed of through the state fine collection
52
center or by payment of a fine without an appearance in open
53
court. The defendant shall appear in person or by attorney
54
for di s position.
55
4. The driver's license of any person found guilty of
56
a first violation of subsection 1 of section 304.050 may be
57
suspended by the director of revenue, with such suspension
58
at the discretion of the court. The director of revenue
59
shall suspend the driver's lice n se of any person found
60
guilty of a violation of subsection 1 of section 304.050, as
61
follows:
62
(1) For a second offense within a five-year period,
63
ninety d a ys; and
64
(2) For a third or subsequent offense within a five-
65
year per i od, one hundred eighty days.

CCS SS SB 1421 27
66
Such suspensions shall be mandatory and shall be in addition
67
to any other driver's license suspension or revocation
68
required or authorized under chapter 302.
69
5. The fines and suspensions required under
70
subsect i ons 2 and 4 of this section shall apply to all
71
violations of subsection 1 of section 304.050, including
72
violations resulting in injury or death of a child, and
73
shall be in addition to the penalties listed under
74
subsection 1 of this section.
1
320.405. 1. For purposes of this section, the
2
following ter m s m e an:
3
(1) "Division", the Missouri division of fire safety
4
within t h e department of public safety;
5
(2) "Missouri fire and life safety standards", minimum
6
fire-pro t ection and life-safety requirements adopted by the
7
division under this section, informed by nationally
8
recognized fire and building safety principles including,
9
but not limited to, best practices reflected in the
10
International Fire Code (IFC), the International Building
11
Code (IBC), and applicable National Fire Protection
12
Association (NFPA) standards, without adopting any model
13
code in whole;
14
(3) "State-inspected facility", any building or
15
occupanc y required under Missouri law or regulation to
16
undergo fire-safety inspections conducted by, or under the
17
authority of, the division. The term "state-inspected
18
facility" shall not include facilities licensed under
19
chapter 198.
20
2. (1) No later than July 1, 2027, the division
21
shall, b y ru l e, adopt Missouri fire and life safety
22
standards establishing minimum requirements for fire
23
protection, means of egress, fire resistance, detection and

CCS SS SB 1421 28
24
alarm systems, suppression systems, emergency operations,
25
and related safety measures for state-inspected facilities.
26
(2) The division may incorporate by reference specific
27
technica l provisions, methods, formulas, or performance
28
criteria derived from nationally recognized fire and
29
building safety standards, provided that no model code shall
30
be adopted in whole.
31
(3) The division may adopt amendments, exceptions, or
32
Missouri - specific modifications as necessary to account for
33
regional conditions, facility types, or statutory
34
requirements.
35
(4) The division shall review the Missouri fire and
36
life saf e ty standards at least every five years and may
37
update such standards by rule under chapter 536.
38
3. Beginning January 1, 2028, the Missouri fire and
39
life sa f ety standards shall apply to a state-inspected
40
facility under any of the following conditions:
41
(1) Initial construction of a state-inspected facility;
42
(2) Major renovation affecting means of egress,
43
detectio n , alarm, or suppression systems;
44
(3) Transfer of ownership, including sale, conveyance,
45
merger, o r change in controlling interest; and
46
(4) Any addition, alteration, or series of related
47
improvem e nts to a state-inspected facility that, in
48
aggregate, are reasonably determined by the division to
49
constitute a substantial improvement, meaning construction,
50
reconstruction, rehabilitation, or installation work where
51
the total cost or scope of work equals or exceeds fifty
52
percent of the facility's pre-improvement market value. For
53
purposes of this subdivision, a formal appraisal shall n ot
54
be required, and the division may rely on reasonable cost
55
estimates, permit valuations, construction contracts, or the

CCS SS SB 1421 29
56
nature of the work performed including, but not limited to,
57
the installation of new fire protection, detection, alarm,
58
or suppression systems.
59
4. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section,
60
state-i n spected facilities existing prior to August 28,
61
2026, shall be considered lawfully nonconforming and shall
62
not be required to comply with the Missouri fire and life
63
safety standards.
64
5. (1) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any
65
city, c o unty , or fire protection district from adopting
66
requirements more stringent than the Missouri fire and life
67
safety standards.
68
(2) No political subdivision shall apply standards
69
less str i ngent than the Missouri fire and life safety
70
standards to any facility regulated under this section.
71
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed as
72
creating a statewide building or fire code applicable to any
73
occupancy not already subject to inspection by the division.
74
6. (1) Compliance with the Missouri fire and life
75
safety s tand a rds shall be verified through inspections
76
conducted by the division or an authorized local
77
jurisdiction.
78
(2) A state-inspected facility shall not be licensed,
79
certifie d , or approved for operation unless the division
80
determines that the facility meets the applicable
81
requirements of this section.
82
(3) The division may issue correction orders,
83
reinspec t ions, or occupancy limitations as authorized by law.
84
7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
85
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
86
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
87
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the

CCS SS SB 1421 30
88
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
89
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
90
if any o f the powers vested with the general assembly
91
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
92
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
93
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
94
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
95
2026, shall be invalid and void.
1
324.1100. As used in sections 324.1100 to 324.1148,
2
the following t erms mean:
3
(1) "Board", the board of private [investigator and
4
private f ire investigator examiners] investigators, private
5
fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents
6
established in section 324.1102;
7
(2) "Client", any person who engages the services of a
8
private i nvestigator or a private fire investigator;
9
(3) "Department", the department of commerce and
10
insuranc e ;
11
(4) "Director", the director of the division of
12
professi o nal registration;
13
(5) "Division", the division of professional
14
registra t ion;
15
(6) "Insurance adjuster", any person who receives any
16
consider a tion, either directly or indirectly, for adjusting
17
in the disposal of any claim under or in connection with a
18
policy of insurance or engaging in soliciting insurance
19
adjustment business;
20
(7) "Law enforcement officer", a law enforcement
21
officer a s defined in section 556.061;
22
(8) "Organization", a corporation, trust, estate,
23
partners h ip, cooperative, or association;
24
(9) "Person", an individual or organization;

CCS SS SB 1421 31
25
(10) "Principal place of business", the place where
26
the licen s ee maintains a permanent office, which may be a
27
residence or business address;
28
(11) "Private fire investigation", the furnishing of,
29
making of , or agreeing to make any investigation of a fire
30
to determine the origin or cause of such fire, or
31
responsibility for such fire;
32
(12) "Private fire investigator", any person who
33
receives a ny consideration, either directly or indirectly,
34
for engaging in private fire investigation;
35
(13) "Private fire investigator agency", a person or
36
firm that employees any person to engage in private fire
37
investigations;
38
(14) "Private investigator", any person who receives
39
any consi d eration, either directly or indirectly, for
40
engaging in the private investigator business;
41
(15) "Private investigator agency", a person who
42
regularly employs any other person, other than an
43
organization, to engage in the private investigator business;
44
(16) "Private investigator business", the furnishing
45
of, makin g of, or agreeing to make, any investigation for
46
the purpose of obtaining information pertaining to:
47
(a) Crimes or wrongs done or threatened against the
48
United S t ates or any state or territory of the United States;
49
(b) The identity, habits, conduct, business,
50
occupati o n, honesty, integrity, credibility, knowledge,
51
trustworthiness, efficiency, loyalty, activity, movement,
52
whereabouts, affiliations, associations, transactions, acts,
53
reputation, or character of any person;
54
(c) The location, disposition, or recovery of lost or
55
stolen p r operty;

CCS SS SB 1421 32
56
(d) Securing evidence to be used before any court,
57
board, o f ficer, or investigating committee;
58
(e) Sale of personal identification information to the
59
public; o r
60
(f) The cause of responsibility for libel, losses,
61
accident , or damage or injury to persons or property or
62
protection of life or property.
1
324.1102. 1. The "Board of Private [Investigator and
2
Private Fire I n ves t igator Examiners] Investigators, Private
3
Fire Investigators, and Professional Surety Bail Bond
4
Agents" is hereby created within the division of
5
professional registration. The board shall be a body
6
corporate and may sue and b e sued. The board shall guide,
7
advise, and make recommendations t o the division and fulfill
8
all other responsibilities designated by sections 324.1100
9
to 324.1148 and sections 324.2100 to 324.2187. The duties
10
and responsibilities of the board with regard t o [private
11
fire investigators] professional surety bail bond agents
12
shall not take full force and effect until such time as the
13
governor appoints the [fire investigator] bail bond agent
14
members and the appointments are confirmed by the senate.
15
Members serving on the board of private investigator and
16
private fire investigator examiners on August 28, [2011]
17
2026, shall continue to serve on the board, fulfill the term
18
they were previously appointed for, and be eligible for
19
reappointment.
20
2. Upon appointment by the governor and confirmation
21
by the s enate of the [private fire investigator] bail bond
22
agent members, the board of private investigator [examiners
23
and the board of licensed] and private fire investigator
24
examiners [are] is abolished and [their] its duties and
25
responsibilities shall merge into the board of private

CCS SS SB 1421 33
26
[investigator and private fire investigator examiners]
27
investigators, private fire investigators, and professional
28
surety bail bond agents as established pursuant to this
29
section. The board shall be a continuance of and shall
30
carry ou t the powers, duties, and functions of the board of
31
private investigator [examiners and the board of licensed]
32
and private fire investigator examiners.
33
3. Every act performed in the exercise of such powers,
34
duties, and authorities by or under the authority of the
35
board of private [investigator and private fire investigator
36
examiners] investigators, private fire investigators, and
37
professional surety bail bond agents shall be deemed to have
38
the same force and effect as if performed by the board of
39
private investigator [examiners or the board of licensed]
40
and private fire investigator examiners.
41
4. All rules and regulations of the board of private
42
investig ator and private fire investigator examiners and all
43
rules promulgated under sections 374.695 to 374.789 shall
44
continue to be effective and shall be deemed to be duly
45
adopted rules and regulations of the board of private
46
[investigator and private fire investigator examiners]
47
investigators, private fire investigators, and professional
48
surety bail bond agents until revised, amended, or repealed
49
by the board. The board shall review such rules and
50
regulations an d shall adopt new rules and regulations as
51
required for the administration of sections 324.1100 to
52
324.1148 and sections 324.2100 to 324.2187.
53
5. Any person licensed [by the board of private
54
investi g ator examiners] under sections 374.695 to 374.789
55
prior to the appointment by the governor and confirmation by
56
the senate of the [private fire investigator] professional

CCS SS SB 1421 34
57
surety bail bond members of the board shall be considered
58
licensed by the board.
59
6. The board shall be composed of [seven] ten members,
60
three m e mbers who have been actively engaged in the private
61
investigator business for the previous five years, two
62
members who have been actively engaged in private fire
63
investigation for the previous five years, three members who
64
have been actively engaged in the general bail bond business
65
or surety recovery for the previous five years, and two
66
public members, appointed by the governor with the advice
67
and consent of the senate. Each member of the board shall
68
be a citizen of the United States, a resident of Missouri
69
for at least one year, and a registered voter. No more than
70
one private investigator [or], private fire in v estigator, or
71
professional surety bail bond board member may be employed
72
by, or affiliated with, the same private investigator agency
73
[or], private fire investigator agency, or bail bond
74
business. The initial [fire investigator] professional
75
surety ba i l bond board members shall not be required to be
76
licensed but shall obtain a license within one hundred
77
eighty days after the effective date of the rules regarding
78
the licensure of [private fire investigators] professional
79
surety bail bond agents. The public members shall each be a
80
person who is not and nev er was a member of any profession
81
licensed or regulated under sections 324.1100 to 324.1148 or
82
sections 324.2100 to 324.2187 or the spouse of such person;
83
and a person who does not have and never has had a material,
84
financial interest in either the providing of the
85
professional services regulated by sections 324.1100 to
86
324.1148 or sections 324.2100 to 324.2187, or an activity or
87
organization directly related to any profession licensed or

CCS SS SB 1421 35
88
regulated under sections 324.1100 to 324.1148 or sections
89
324.2100 to 324.2187.
90
7. The members shall be appointed for terms of five
91
years, e xcept of the first two members appointed who are
92
fire investigators, one member shall be appointed for a term
93
of five years and one member shall be appointed for a term
94
of three years. Any vacancy on the board shall be filled
95
for the unexpir e d term of the member.
96
8. The members of the board may receive compensation,
97
as dete r mined by the director for their services, if
98
appropriate, and shall be reimbursed for actual and
99
necessary expenses incurred in performing their official
100
duties on the board.
101
9. All money held in the board of private investigator
102
and pri v ate fire investigator examiners fund shall be
103
transferred to the "Board of Private [Investigator and
104
Private Fire Investigator Examiners] Investigators, Private
105
Fire Investigators, and Professional Surety Bail Bond Agents
106
Fund" which is hereby created. The board of private
107
[investigator and private fire investigator examiners]
108
investigators, private fire investigators, and professional
109
surety bail bond agents fund shall consist of money
110
collected under sections 324.1100 to 324.1148 and sections
111
324.2100 to 324.2187. The state treasurer shall be
112
custodian of the fund and may approve disbursements from the
113
fund in accordance with the provisions of sections 30.170
114
and 30.180. Upon appropriation, money in the fund shall be
115
used solely for the administration of sections 324.1100 to
116
324.1148 and sections 324.2100 to 324.2187. The provisions
117
of section 33.080 to the contrary notwithst a nding, money in
118
this fund shall not be transferred and placed to the credit
119
of general revenue until the amount in the fund at the end

CCS SS SB 1421 36
120
of the biennium exceeds two times the amount of the
121
appropriation from the board's funds for the preceding
122
fiscal year or, if the board requires by rule permit renewal
123
less frequently than yearly, then three times the
124
appropriation from the board's funds for the preceding
125
fiscal year. The amount, if any, in the fund which shall
126
lapse is tha t amount in the fund which exceeds the
127
appropriate multiple of the appropriations from the board's
128
funds for the preceding fiscal year.
1
324.1103. For the purposes of sections 324.1100 to
2
324.1148 and s e ctions 324.2100 to 324.2187, the division
3
shall:
4
(1) Employ board personnel, within the limits of the
5
appropri a tions for that purpose as established in sections
6
324.1100 to 324.1148 and sections 324.2100 to 324.2187;
7
(2) Exercise all administrative functions;
8
(3) Deposit all fees collected under sections 324.1100
9
to 324.1 1 48 and sections 324.2100 to 324.2187 by
10
transmitting such funds to the department of revenue for
11
deposit in the state treasury to the credit of the board of
12
private [investigator and private fire investigator
13
examiners] investigators, private fire investigators, and
14
professional surety bail bond agents fund.
1
324.1105. 1. The board of private [investigator and
2
private fire i n ves t igator examiners] investigators, private
3
fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents
4
may require that fingerprint submissions be made as part of
5
an application seeking licensure as a private investigator
6
or private fire investigator or as an employee of a private
7
investigator agency or private fire investigator agency, as
8
such terms are defined in section 324.1100.

CCS SS SB 1421 37
9
2. If the board of private [investigator and private
10
fire in v estigator examiners] investigators, private fire
11
investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents
12
requires that fingerprint submissions be made as part of
13
such application, the board of private [investigator and
14
private fire investigator examiners] investigators, private
15
fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents
16
shall require applicants to submit the fingerprints to the
17
Missouri state highway patrol for the purpose of conducting
18
a state and federal fingerprint-based criminal history
19
background check.
20
3. The fingerprints and any required fees shall be
21
sent to the Missouri state highway patrol's central
22
repository. The fingerprints shall be used for searching
23
the state cr iminal records repository and shall also be
24
forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a
25
federal criminal records search under section 43.540. The
26
Missouri state highway patrol shall notify the board o f
27
private [investigator and private fire investigator
28
examiners] investigators, private fire investigators, and
29
professional surety bail bond agents of any criminal history
30
record information or lack of criminal history record
31
information discovered on the individual. Notwithstanding
32
the provisions of section 610.120 to the c ontrary, all
33
records related to any criminal history information
34
discovered shall be accessible and available to the board of
35
private [investigator and private fire investigator
36
examiners] investigators, private fire investigators, and
37
professional surety bail bond agents.
1
324.1116. A private investigator agency or private
2
fire investiga t or agency shall not hire any individual as an
3
employee unless the individual:

CCS SS SB 1421 38
4
(1) Is at least twenty-one years of age;
5
(2) Provides two recent photographs of themselves, of
6
a type p r escribed by the board [of private investigator
7
examiners];
8
(3) Has been fingerprinted in a manner approved by the
9
Missouri state highway patrol, central repository, under
10
section 43.543; and
11
(4) Complies with any other qualifications and
12
requirem e nts the board adopts by rule.
1
324.1134. 1. The board may suspend or refuse to issue
2
or renew any c e rti f icate of registration or authority,
3
permit or license required under sections 324.1100 to
4
324.1148 for one or any combination of causes stated in
5
subsection 2 of this section. The board shall notify the
6
applicant in writing of the r e asons for the suspension or
7
refusal and shall advise the applicant of the applicant's
8
right to file a complaint with the administrative hearing
9
commission as provided by chapter 621. As an alternative to
10
a refusal to issue or renew any certif i cate, registration or
11
authority, the board may, at its discretion, issue a license
12
which is subject to probation, restriction or limitation to
13
an applicant for licensure for any one or any combination of
14
causes stated in subsection 2 of this section. The board's
15
order of probation, limitation or restriction s hall contain
16
a statement of the discipline imposed, the basis therefor,
17
the date such action shall become effective, and a statement
18
that the applicant has thirty days to request in writing a
19
hearing before the administrative hearing commission. If
20
the board issues a probationary, limited or restricte d
21
license to an applicant for licensure, either party may file
22
a written petition with the administrative hearing
23
commission within thirty days of the effective date of the

CCS SS SB 1421 39
24
probationary, limited or restricted license seeking review
25
of the board's determination. If no written request for a
26
hearing is received by the ad m inistrative hearing commission
27
within the thirty-day period, the right to seek review of
28
the board's decision shall be considered as waived.
29
2. The board may cause a complaint to be filed with
30
the adm i nistrative hearing commission as provided by chapter
31
621 against any holder of any certificate of registration or
32
authority, permit or license required by sections 324.1100
33
to 324.1148 or any person who has failed to renew or has
34
surrendered the person's certificate of registration or
35
authority, permit or license for any one or any combination
36
of the following causes:
37
(1) Making any false statement or giving any false
38
informat i on or given any false information in connection
39
with an application for a license or a renewal or
40
reinstatement thereof;
41
(2) Violating any provision of sections 324.1100 to
42
324.1148 ;
43
(3) Violating any rule of the board [of private
44
investig a tor examiners] adopted under the authority
45
contained in sections 324.1100 to 324.1148;
46
(4) Impersonating, or permitting or aiding and
47
abetting an employee to impersonate, a law enforcement
48
officer, fire safety officer, or employee of the United
49
States of America, or of any state or political subdivision
50
thereof;
51
(5) Committing, or permitting any employee to commit
52
any act, while the license was expired, which would be cause
53
for the suspension or revocation of a license, or grounds
54
for the denial of an application for a license;

CCS SS SB 1421 40
55
(6) Knowingly violating, or advising, encouraging, or
56
assistin g the violation of, any court order or injunction in
57
the course of business as a licensee;
58
(7) Using any letterhead, advertisement, or other
59
printed m atter, or in any manner whatever represented that
60
such person is an instrumentality of the federal government,
61
a state, or any political subdivision thereof;
62
(8) Using a name different from that under which such
63
person i s currently licensed in any advertisement,
64
solicitation, or contract for business;
65
(9) Violating or assisting or enabling any person to
66
violate a ny provision of this chapter or any lawful rule or
67
regulation adopted pursuant to the authority granted in this
68
chapter; or
69
(10) Committing any act which is grounds for denial of
70
an applic a tion for a license under section 324.1112.
71
3. The record of conviction, or a certified copy
72
thereof , shall be conclusive evidence of such conviction,
73
and a plea or verdict of guilty is deemed to be a conviction
74
within the meaning thereof.
75
4. The agency may continue under the direction of
76
another employee if the licensee's license is suspended or
77
revoked by the board. The board shall establish a time
78
frame in which the age ncy shall identify an acceptable
79
person who is qualified to assume control of the agency, as
80
required by the board.
81
5. After the filing of a complaint before the
82
adminis t rative hearing commission, the proceedings shall be
83
conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 621.
84
Upon a finding by the administrative hearing commission tha t
85
the grounds in subsection [1] 2 of this section for
86
disciplinary action are met, the board may singly or in

CCS SS SB 1421 41
87
combination censure or place the person named in the
88
complaint on probation under such terms and conditions as
89
the board deems appropriate for a period not to exceed five
90
years, may suspend for a period not to exceed three years,
91
or revoke the license.
1
[374.695.] 324.2100. Sections [374.695 to 374.789]
2
324.2100 to 324 .2187 may b e known and shall be cited as the
3
"Professional Bail Bondsman and Surety Recovery Agent
4
Licensure Act".
1
[374.700.] 324.2103. As used in sections [374.695 to
2
374.789] 324.21 00 to 324. 2 187, the following terms shall
3
mean:
4
(1) "Bail bond agent", a surety agent or an agent of a
5
property bail bondsman who is duly licensed pursuant to the
6
provisions of sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to
7
324.2187, is employed by and is working under the authority
8
of a licensed general bail bond agent;
9
(2) "Bail bond or appearance bond", a bond for a
10
specified monetary amount which is executed by the defendant
11
and a qualified licensee pursuant to sections [374.695 to
12
374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187, and which is issued to a
13
court or authorized officer as security for the subsequent
14
court appearance of the defendant upon the defendant's
15
release from actual custody pending the appearance;
16
(3) "Board", the board of private investigators,
17
private f ire investigators, and professional surety bail
18
bond agents established in section 324.1102 within the
19
division;
20
(4) "Department", the department of commerce and
21
insuranc e of the state of Missouri;

CCS SS SB 1421 42
22
[(4)] (5) "Director", the director of the division of
23
profession al r e gistration of the department of commerce and
24
insurance;
25
[(5)] (6) "Division", the division of professional
26
registrati on o f the department of commerce and insurance;
27
(7) "General bail bond agent", a surety agent or a
28
property bail bondsman, as defined in sections [374.700 to
29
374.775] 324.2103 to 324.2166, who is licensed in accordance
30
with sections [374.700 to 374.775] 324.2103 to 324.2166 and
31
who devotes at least fifty percent of his or her working
32
time to the bail bond business in this state;
33
[(6)] (8) "Insurer", any surety insurance company
34
which is q uali f ied by the department to transact surety
35
business in Missouri;
36
[(7)] (9) "Licensee", a bail bond agent or a general
37
bail bond agen t ;
38
[(8)] (10) "Property bail bondsman", a person who
39
pledges Un ited S tates currency, United States postal money
40
orders or cashier's checks or other property as security for
41
a bail bond in connection with a judicial proceeding, and
42
who receives or is promised therefor money or other things
43
of value;
44
[(9)] (11) "Surety bail bond agent", any person
45
appointed by an insurer by power of attorney to execute or
46
countersign bail bonds in connection with judicial
47
proceedings, and who receives or is promised money or other
48
things of value therefor;
49
[(10)] (12) "Surety recovery agent", a person not
50
performing t he d u ties of a sworn peace officer who tracks
51
down, captures and surrenders to the custody of a court a
52
fugitive who has violated a bail bond agreement, excluding a
53
bail bond agent or general bail bond agent;

CCS SS SB 1421 43
54
[(11)] (13) "Taking a bail" or "take bail", the
55
acceptance b y a p erson authorized to take bail of the
56
undertaking of a sufficient surety for the appearance of the
57
defendant according to the terms of the undertaking or that
58
the surety will pay to the court the sum specified. Taking
59
of bail or take bail does not include the fixing of the
60
amount of bail and no person other than a competent court
61
shall fix the amount of bail.
1
[374.702.] 324.2109. 1. No person shall engage in the
2
bail bond busine ss as a b a il b ond agent or a general bail
3
bond agent without being licensed as provided in sections
4
[374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166.
5
2. No judge, attorney, court official, law enforcement
6
officer , state, county, or municipal employee who is either
7
elected or appointed shall be licensed as a bail bond agent
8
or a general bail bond agent.
9
3. A licensed bail bond agent shall not execute or
10
issue a n appearance bond in this state without holding a
11
valid appointment from a general bail bond agent and without
12
attaching to the appearance bond an executed and prenumbered
13
power of attorney referencing the general bail bond agent or
14
insurer.
15
4. A person licensed as an active bail bond agent
16
shall h o ld the license for at least two years prior to
17
owning or being an officer of a licensed general bail bond
18
agent.
19
5. A general bail bond agent shall not engage in the
20
bail bo n d business:
21
(1) Without having been licensed as a general bail
22
bond age n t pursuant to sections [374.695 to 374.775]
23
324.2100 to 324.2166; or

CCS SS SB 1421 44
24
(2) Except through an agent licensed as a bail bond
25
agent pu r suant to sections [374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100 to
26
324.2166.
27
6. A general bail bond agent shall not permit any
28
unlicens ed person to solicit or engage in the bail bond
29
business on the general bail bond agent's behalf, except for
30
individuals who are employed solely for the performance of
31
clerical, stenographic, investigative, or other
32
administrative duties which do not require a license
33
pursuant to sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to
34
324.2187.
35
7. Any person who is convicted of a violation of this
36
section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. For any
37
subsequent convictions, a person who is con v icted of a
38
violation of this section is guilty of a class E felony.
1
[374.705.] 324.2112. 1. The [department shall
2
administer and enforce th e pr o visions of sections 374.695 to
3
374.789, prescribe the duties of its officers and employees
4
with respect to sections 374.695 to 374.789, and] board
5
shall promulgate, pursuant to [section 374.045 and] chapter
6
536, such rules and regulations within the scope and purview
7
of the provisions of sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100
8
to 324.2187 as the [director] board considers necessary and
9
proper for the effective administration and interpretation
10
of the provisions of sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100
11
to 324.2187.
12
2. The [director] board shall set the amount of all
13
fees au t horized and required by the provisions of sections
14
[374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187 by rules and
15
regulations promulgated pursuant to chapter 536. All such
16
fees shall be set at a level designed to produce revenue
17
which shall not substantially exceed the cost and expense of

CCS SS SB 1421 45
18
administering the provisions of sections [374.695 to
19
374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187. [However, such fees shall
20
not exceed one hundred fifty d o llars every two years for
21
biennial licenses and renewable licenses for general bail
22
bond agents as provided for in section 374.710.]
23
3. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
24
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
25
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
26
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
27
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
28
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
29
if any o f the powers vested with the general assembly
30
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
31
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
32
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
33
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
34
2026, shall be invalid and void.
1
[374.710.] 324.2115. 1. Except as otherwise provided
2
in sections [37 4.695 to 3 7 4.7 7 5] 324.2100 to 324.2166, no
3
person or other entity shall practice as a bail bond agent
4
or general bail bond agent, as defined in section [374.700]
5
324.2103, in Missouri unless and until the [department]
6
board has issued to him or her a license, to be renewed
7
every two years as hereinafter provided, to practice as a
8
bail bond agent or general bail bond agent.
9
2. An applicant for a bail bond and general bail bond
10
agent li cense shall submit with the application proof that
11
he or she has received twenty-four hours of initial basic
12
training in areas of instruction in subjects determined by
13
the [director] board deemed appropriate to professionals in
14
the bail bond profession. Bail bond agents and general bail
15
bond agents who are licen s ed at the date which this act

CCS SS SB 1421 46
16
becomes law shall be exempt from such twenty-four hours of
17
initial basic training.
18
3. In addition to the twenty-four hours of initial
19
basic t r aining to become a bail bond agent or general bail
20
bond agent, there shall be eight hours of biennial
21
continuing education for all bail bond agents and general
22
bail bond agents to maintain their state license. The
23
[director] board shall determine said appropriate areas of
24
instruction for said biennial continuing education. The
25
[director] board shall determine which institutions ,
26
organizations, associations, and individuals shall be
27
eligible to provide the initial basic training and the
28
biennial continuing education instruction. The [department]
29
board may allow state institutions, organi z ations,
30
associations, or individuals to provide courses for the
31
initial basic training and the biennial continuing education
32
training. [The cost shall not exceed two hundred dollars
33
for the i n itial basic training and one hundred fifty dollars
34
for biennial continuing education.]
35
4. Upon completion of said basic training or biennial
36
continui ng education and the licensee meeting the other
37
requirements as provided under sections [374.695 to 374.789]
38
324.2100 to 324.2187, the [director] board shall issue a two-
39
year license for the bail bond agent or general bail bond
40
agent [for a fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars].
41
5. Nothing in sections [374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100
42
to 324. 2 166 shall be construed to prohibit any person from
43
posting or otherwise providing a bail bond in connection
44
with any legal proceeding, provided that such person
45
receives no fee, remuneration or consideration therefor.
1
[374.711.] 324.2118. 1. The [department of commerce
2
and insurance] board of p r iva t e investigators, private fire

CCS SS SB 1421 47
3
investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents may
4
require that fingerprint submissions be made as part of an
5
application seeking a license, or renewal of a license, for
6
and as a general bail bond agent, a bail bond agent, or a
7
surety recovery agent, as such terms are defined in section
8
[374.700] 324.2103.
9
2. If the [department of commerce and insurance] board
10
of priv a te investigators, private fire investigators, and
11
professional surety bail bond agents requires that
12
fingerprint submissions be made as part of such application,
13
the [department of commerce and insurance] board of private
14
investigators, private fire investigators, and professional
15
surety bail bond agents shall require applicants to submit
16
the fingerprints to the Missouri state highway patrol for
17
the purpose of conducting a state and federal fingerprint-
18
based criminal history background check.
19
3. The fingerprints and any required fees shall be
20
sent to the Missouri state highway patrol's central
21
repository. The fingerprints shall be used for searching
22
the state cr iminal records repository and shall also be
23
forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a
24
federal criminal records search under section 43.540. The
25
Missouri state highway patrol shall notify the [depar t ment]
26
board of private investigators, private fire investigators,
27
and professional surety bail bond agents of any criminal
28
history record information or lack of criminal history
29
record information discovered on the individual.
30
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 610.12 0 to the
31
contrary, all records related to any criminal history
32
information discovered shall be accessible and available to
33
the [department] board of private investigators, private
34
fire investigators, and professional surety bail bond agents.

CCS SS SB 1421 48
1
[374.715.] 324.2121. 1. Applications for examination
2
and licensure as a bail b o nd a gent or general bail bond
3
agent shall be in writing and on forms prescribed and
4
furnished by the [department] board, and shall contain such
5
information as the [department] board requires. Each
6
application shall be accompanied by proof satis f actory to
7
the [department] board that the applicant is a citizen of
8
the United States, has a high school diploma or general
9
education development certificate (GED), is of good moral
10
character, and meets the qualifications for surety on bail
11
bonds as provided by supreme court rule. Each application
12
shall be accompanied by the examination a nd application fee
13
set by the [department] board. Individuals currently
14
employed as bail bond agents a n d general bail bond agents
15
shall not be required to meet the education requirements
16
needed for licensure pursuant to this section.
17
2. In addition, each applicant for licensure as a
18
general bail bond agent shall furnish proof satisfactory to
19
the [department] board that the applicant or, if the
20
applicant is a corporation, that each officer thereof has
21
completed at least two years as a bail bond agent, and that
22
the applicant possesses liquid assets of at least ten
23
thousand dollars, along with a duly executed assignment of
24
ten thousand dollars to the state of Missouri. The
25
assignment shall become effective upon the app l icant's
26
violating any provision of sections [374.695 to 374.789]
27
324.2100 to 324.2187. The assignment required by this
28
section shall be in th e form and executed in the manner
29
prescribed by the [department] board. The [director] board
30
may require by regulation conditions b y which additional
31
assignments of assets of the general bail bond agent may
32
occur when the circumstances of the business of the general

CCS SS SB 1421 49
33
bail bond agent warrants additional funds. However, such
34
additional funds shall not exceed twenty-f i ve thousand
35
dollars.
1
[374.716.] 324.2124. 1. Every bail bond agent shall
2
account for each power of att o rney assigned by the general
3
bail bond agent on a weekly basis and remit all sums
4
collected and owed to the general bail bond agent pursuant
5
to his or her written contract. The general bail bond agent
6
shall maintain the weekly accou n ting and remittance records
7
for a period of three years. Such records shall be subject
8
to inspection by the [direct o r or his or her designee] board
9
during regular business hours or at other reasonable times.
10
2. For every bond written in this state, the licensee
11
shall p r ovide to the principal a copy of the bail contract.
1
[374.717.] 324.2127. No insurer or licensee, court, or
2
law enforcement officer s h all:
3
(1) Pay a fee or rebate or give or promise anything of
4
value in order to secure a settlement, compromise,
5
remission, or reduction of the amount of any bail bond to:
6
(a) A jailer, police officer, peace officer,
7
committi n g judge, or any other person who has power to
8
arrest or to hold in custody any person; or
9
(b) Any public official or public employee;
10
(2) Pay a fee or rebate or give anything of value to
11
an attor n ey in bail bond matters, except in defense of any
12
action on a bond;
13
(3) Pay a fee or rebate or give anything of value to
14
the prin c ipal or anyone on the principal's behalf;
15
(4) Accept anything of value from a principal except
16
the prem i um and expenses incurred, provided that the
17
licensee shall be permitted to accept collateral security or

CCS SS SB 1421 50
18
other indemnity from the principal in accordance with the
19
provisions of section [374.719] 324.2130.
1
[374.719.] 324.2130. 1. A licensee may accept
2
collateral secur ity from t he p rincipal in a fiduciary
3
capacity, which collateral shall be returned upon final
4
termination of liability on the bond. When a licensee
5
accepts collateral, the licensee shall provide a prenumbered
6
written receipt, which shall include a detailed account of
7
the collateral received by the licensee. The acceptance of
8
collateral security by a bail bond agent shall be reported
9
to the general bail bond agent.
10
2. The collateral security required by the licensee
11
shall b e reasonable in relation to the amount of the bond.
12
3. If a failure to appear, absconding or attempting to
13
abscond , or a judgment of forfeiture on the bond has
14
occurred, the collateral security may be used to reimburse
15
the licensee for any costs and expenses incurred associated
16
with the forfeiture.
17
4. The general bail bond agent shall retain records of
18
the acc e ptance, return, or judgment of forfeiture resulting
19
in the use of the collateral to reimburse the licensee for a
20
period of three years.
1
[374.720.] 324.2133. 1. Each applicant for licensure
2
as a general bai l bond ag e nt, after complying with this
3
section and the provisions of section [374.715] 324.2121,
4
shall be issued a license by the [department] board unless
5
grounds exist under section [374.755] 324.2145 for denial of
6
a license.
7
2. Each applicant for examination and licensure as a
8
bail bo n d agent, after complying with the provisions of
9
section [374.715] 324.2121, shall appear for examination at
10
the time and place specified by the [department] board.

CCS SS SB 1421 51
11
Such examination shall be as prescribed by the [director as
12
provided under section 375.018] board and shall be designed
13
to test the applicant's knowledge and expertise in the area
14
of surety bonds in general and the practice of a bail bond
15
agent, as defined in sections [374.700 to 374.775] 324.2103
16
to 324.2166, in particular. The applicant shall be notified
17
of the result of the examination within twenty working days
18
of the examination. Any applicant who fails such
19
examination may, up o n reapplication and payment of the
20
reexamination fee set by the [department] board, retake the
21
examination.
1
[374.730.] 324.2136. All licenses issued to bail bond
2
agents and gene ral bail b o nd agents under the provisions of
3
sections [374.700 to 374.775] 324.2103 to 324.2166 shall be
4
renewed biennially, which renewal shall be in the form and
5
manner prescribed by the [department] board and shall be
6
accompanied by the renewal fee set by the [department] board.
1
[374.740.] 324.2139. Any person applying to be
2
licensed as a n onresident general bail bond agent who has
3
been licensed in another state shall devote fifty percent of
4
his or her working time in the state of Missouri and shall
5
file proof with the [director of the department of commerce
6
and insurance] board as to his or her compliance, and
7
accompany his or her application with the fees set by the
8
[director] board by regulation and, if applying for a
9
nonresident general bail bond agent's license, with a duly
10
executed assignment of twenty-five thousand dollars to the
11
state of Missouri, which assignment shall become effective
12
upon the applicant's violating any provision of sections
13
[374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187. Failure to
14
comply with this section will result in re v ocation of the
15
nonresidence license. The assignment required by this

CCS SS SB 1421 52
16
section shall be in the form and executed in the manner
17
prescribed by the [department] board. All licenses issued
18
pursuant to this section shall be sub j ect to the same
19
renewal requirements set for other licenses issued pursuant
20
to sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187.
1
[374.750.] 324.2142. The [department] board may refuse
2
to issue or ren ew any lic e nse required pursuant to sections
3
[374.700 to 374.775] 324.2103 to 324.2166 for any one or any
4
combination of causes stated in section [374.755] 324.2145.
5
The [department] board shall notify the applicant in writin g
6
of the reasons for the refusal and shall advise the
7
applicant of his or her right to file a complaint with the
8
administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
1
[374.755.] 324.2145. 1. The [department] board may
2
cause a complain t to be f i led with the administrative
3
hearing commission as provided by chapter 621 against any
4
holder of any license required by sections [374.695 to
5
374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166 or any person who has failed
6
to renew or has surrendered his or her license for any one
7
or any combination of the following causes:
8
(1) Use of any controlled substance, as defined in
9
chapter 1 95, or alcoholic beverage to an extent that such
10
use impairs a person's ability to perform the work of the
11
profession licensed under sections [374.695 to 374.775]
12
324.2100 to 324.2166;
13
(2) Final adjudication or a plea of guilty or nolo
14
contende r e within the past fifteen years in a criminal
15
prosecution under any state or federal law for a felony or a
16
crime involving moral turpitude whether or not a sentence is
17
imposed, prior to issuance of license date;
18
(3) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation or
19
bribery i n securing any license or in obtaining permission

CCS SS SB 1421 53
20
to take any examination required pursuant to sections
21
[374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166;
22
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any compensation
23
as a mem b er of the profession licensed by sections [374.695
24
to 374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166 by means of fraud,
25
deception or misrepresentation;
26
(5) Misappropriation of the premium, collateral, or
27
other th i ngs of value given to a bail bond agent or a
28
general bail bond agent for the taking of bail,
29
incompetency, misconduct, gross negligence, fraud, or
30
misrepresentation in the performance of the functions or
31
duties of the profession licensed or regulated by sections
32
[374.695 to 374.775] 324.2100 to 324.2166;
33
(6) Violation of any provision of or any obligation
34
imposed b y the laws of this state, [department of commerce
35
and insurance] board rules and regulations, or aiding or
36
abetting other persons to violate such laws, orders, rules
37
or regulations, or subpoenas;
38
(7) Transferring a license or permitting another
39
person t o use a license of the licensee;
40
(8) Disciplinary action against the holder of a
41
license o r other right to practice the profession regulated
42
by sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187
43
granted by another state, territory, federal agency or
44
country upon grounds for which revocation or suspension is
45
authorized in this state;
46
(9) Being finally adjudged insane or incompetent by a
47
court of competent jurisdiction;
48
(10) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or
49
offer to p ractice the profession licensed or regulated by
50
sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187 who is

CCS SS SB 1421 54
51
not currently licensed and eligible to practice pursuant to
52
sections [374.695 to 374.789] 324.2100 to 324.2187;
53
(11) Acting in the capacity of an attorney at a trial
54
or hearin g of a person for whom the attorney is acting as
55
surety;
56
(12) Failing to provide a copy of the bail contract,
57
renumbere d written receipt for acceptance of money, or other
58
collateral for the taking of bail to the principal, if
59
requested by any person who is a party to the bail contract,
60
or any person providing funds or collateral for bail on the
61
principal's behalf.
62
2. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings
63
shall b e conducted in accordance with the provisions of
64
chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
65
commission t h at one or more of the causes stated in
66
subsection 1 of this section have been met, the [director]
67
board may, singly or in combination, censure or place the
68
person named in the complaint on probation under such terms
69
and conditions as the board deems appropriate or suspend or
70
revoke the license [or enter into an agreement for a
71
monetary or other penalty pursuant to section 374.280.
72
3. In lieu of filing a complaint at the administrative
73
hearing commission, the director and the bail bond agent or
74
general bail bond agent may enter into an agreement for a
75
monetary or other penalty pursuant to section 374.280.
76
4. In addition to any other remedies available, the
77
directo r may issue a cease and desist order or may seek an
78
injunction in a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to
79
the provisions of section 374.046 whenever it appears that
80
any person is acting as a bail bond agent or general bail
81
bond agent without a license or violating any other
82
provisions of sections 374.695 to 374.789].

CCS SS SB 1421 55
1
[374.757.] 324.2148. 1. Any agent licensed by
2
sections [374.6 95 to 374. 7 75] 324.2100 to 324.2166 who
3
intends to apprehend any person in this state shall inform
4
law enforcement authorities in the city or county in which
5
such agent intends such apprehension, before attempting such
6
apprehension. Such agent shall present to the local law
7
enforcement a u thorities a certified copy of the bond and all
8
other appropriate paperwork identifying the principal and
9
the person to be apprehended. Local law enforcement may
10
accompany the agent. Failure o f any agent to whom this
11
section applies to c o mply with the provisions of this
12
section shall be a class A misdemeanor for the first
13
violation and a class E felony for subsequent violations;
14
and shall also be a violation of section [374.755] 324.2145
15
and may in addition be punished pursuant to that section.
16
2. The surety recovery agent shall inform the local
17
law enf o rcement in the county or city where such agent is
18
planning to enter a residence. Such agent shall have a
19
certified copy of the bond and all appropriate paperwork to
20
identify the principal. Local law enforcement, when
21
notified, may accompany the surety recovery agent to that
22
location to keep the peace if an active warrant is effective
23
for a felony or misdemeanor. If a warrant is not active,
24
the local law enforcement of f icers may accompany the surety
25
recovery agent to such location. Failure to report to the
26
local law enforcement agency is a class A misdemeanor. For
27
any subsequent violations, failure to report to the loc al
28
law enforcement agency is a class E felony.
1
[374.759.] 324.2151. 1. Any bail bond agent licensed
2
in the state of Missouri s hal l have access to all publicly
3
available court records of the defendant by available means
4
to make a realistic assessment of the defendant's

CCS SS SB 1421 56
5
probability of attending all court dates as set in his or
6
her charges relating to the bond request.
7
2. Any defendant shall have free access to any bail
8
bond ag e nt via one phone call so long as the call is made to
9
a local phone number. All other numbers may be available as
10
a collect call to any nonlocal number.
11
3. All Missouri licensed bail bond agents or licensed
12
general agents shall be qualified, without further
13
requirements, in all jurisdictions of this state, as
14
provided in rules promulgated by the supreme court of
15
Missouri and not by any circuit court rule.
1
[374.760.] 324.2154. Each general bail bond agent
2
shall file, bet ween the f i rst and tenth day of each month,
3
sworn affidavits with the [department] board stating that
4
there are no unsatisfied judgments against him or her. Such
5
affidavits shall be in the form and manner prescribed b y the
6
[department] board.
1
[374.763.] 324.2157. 1. If any final judgment
2
ordering forfeit ure of a d efe n dant's bond is not paid within
3
a six-month period of time, the court shall extend the
4
judgment date or notify the [department] board of the
5
failure to satisfy such judgment. The [director] board
6
shall draw upon the assets of the surety, remit the sum to
7
the court, and obtain a receipt of such sum from the court.
8
The [director] board may take action as provided by section
9
[374.755] 324.2145, regarding the license of the surety and
10
any bail bond agents writing upon the surety's liability.
11
2. The [department] board shall furnish to the
12
presidi n g judge of each circuit court of this state, on at
13
least a monthly basis, a list of all duly licensed and
14
qualified bail bond agents and general bail bond agents
15
whose licenses are not subject to pending suspension or

CCS SS SB 1421 57
16
revocation proceedings, and who are not subject to
17
unsatisfied bond forfeiture judgments. In lieu of such
18
list, the [department] board may provi d e this information to
19
each presiding judge in an electronic format.
20
3. All duly licensed and qualified bail bond agents
21
and gen e ral bail bond agents shall be qualified, without
22
further requirement, to write bail upon a surety's liability
23
in all courts of this state as provided in rules promulgated
24
by the supreme court of Missouri and not by any circuit
25
court rule.
1
[374.764.] 324.2160. 1. The [director] board shall
2
examine and inqu ire into a ll a lleged violations or
3
complaints filed with the [department of commerce and
4
insurance] board of the bail bond law of the state, and
5
inquire into and investigate the bail bond business
6
transacted in the state by any bail bond agent, general bail
7
bond agent, or surety recovery agent.
8
2. The [director or any of his or her duly appointed
9
agents] board may compel the attendance before [him or her]
10
the board, and may examine, under oath, the directors,
11
officers, bail bond agents, general bail bond agents, surety
12
recovery agents, employees, or any other person in reference
13
to the condition, affairs, management of the bail bond or
14
surety recovery business, or any matters relating thereto.
15
[He or she] The board may administer oaths or affirmations
16
and shall have power to summon and compel the attendance of
17
witnesses and to require and compel the production of
18
records, books, papers, contracts, or other documents if
19
necessary.
20
3. [The director may make and conduct the
21
investi g ation in person or the director may appoint one or
22
more persons to make and conduct the investigation. If made

CCS SS SB 1421 58
23
by a person other than the director, the person duly
24
appointed by the director shall have the same powers as
25
granted to the director pursuant to this section. A
26
certificate of appointment under the official sea l of the
27
director shall be sufficient authority and evidence thereof
28
for the person to act.] For the purpose of making the
29
investigations, or havi n g the same made, the [director]
30
board may employ the necessary clerical, actuarial, and
31
other assistance.
1
[374.770.] 324.2163. 1. If there is a breach of the
2
contract of the bond, the cou r t in which the case is pending
3
shall declare a bond forfeiture, unless the surety upon such
4
bond informs the court that the defendant is incarcerated
5
somewhere within the United States. If forfeiture is not
6
ordered because the defendant is in c arcerated somewhere
7
within the United States, the surety is responsible for the
8
return of the defendant. If bond forfeiture is ordered and
9
the surety can subsequen t ly prove the defendant is
10
incarcerated somewhere within the United States, then the
11
bond forfeiture shall be set aside and the surety be
12
responsible for the return of the defendant. When the
13
surety notifies the court of the whereabouts of the
14
defendant, a hold order shall be placed by the court having
15
jurisdiction on the defendant in the state in which the
16
defendant is being held.
17
2. In all instances in which a bail bond agent or
18
general bail bond agent duly licensed by sections [374.700
19
to 374.775] 324.2103 to 324.2166 has given his or her bond
20
for bail for any defendant who has absented himself in
21
violation of the condition of such bond, the bail bond agent
22
or general bail bond agent shall have the first opportunity
23
to return such defendant to the proper court. If he or she

CCS SS SB 1421 59
24
is unable to return such defendant, the state of Missouri
25
shall return such defendant to the proper court for
26
prosecution, and all costs incurred by the state in so
27
returning a defendant may be levied against the bail bond
28
agent or general bail bond agent in question.
1
[374.775.] 324.2166. When issuing bonds of one
2
thousand dollar s or less, licensed bail bond agents or
3
general bail bond agents may charge a minimum premium of
4
fifty dollars. In connection with such bonds no bail bond
5
agent, general bail bond agent, or corporation shall charge
6
or receive any additional fee for investigations or services
7
rendered in connection with the execution of the bond.
1
[374.783.] 324.2169. 1. No person shall hold himself
2
or herself out a s being a sur e ty recovery agent in this
3
state, unless such person is licensed in accordance with the
4
provisions of sections [374.783 to 374.789] 324.2169 to
5
324.2187. Licensed bail bond agents and general bail bond
6
agents ma y perform fugitive recovery without being licensed
7
as a surety recovery agent.
8
2. The [director] board shall have authority to
9
license all surety recovery agents in this state. The
10
[director] board shall have control and supervisi o n over the
11
licensing of such agents and the enforcement of the terms
12
and provisions of sections [374.783 to 374.789] 324.2169 to
13
324.2187.
14
3. The [director] board shall have the power to:
15
(1 ) Set and determine the amount of the fees
16
authoriz e d and required pursuant to sections [374.783 to
17
374.789] 324.2169 to 324.2187. The fees shall be set at a
18
level sufficient to produce re v enue which shall not
19
substantially exceed the cost and expense of administering
20
sections [374.783 to 374.789] 324.2169 to 324.2187[.

CCS SS SB 1421 60
21
However, such fees shall not exceed one hundred fifty
22
dollars for a two-year license]; and
23
(2) Determine the sufficient qualifications of
24
applican t s for a license.
25
4. The [director] board shall license for a period of
26
two yea r s all surety recovery agents in this state who meet
27
the requirements of sections [374.783 to 374.789] 324.2169
28
to 324.2187.
1
[374.784.] 324.2172. 1. Applications for examination
2
and licensure as a surety rec o very agent shall be submitted
3
on forms prescribed by the [department] board and shall
4
contain such information as the [department] board requires,
5
along with a copy of the front and back of a photographic
6
identification card.
7
2. Each application shall be accompanied by proof
8
satisfa c tory to the [director] board that the applicant is a
9
citizen of the United States and has a high school diploma
10
or a general educational development certificate (GED). An
11
applicant shall furnish evidence of such person's
12
qualifications by completing an approved surety recovery
13
agent course with at least twenty-four hours of initial
14
minimum training. The [director] board shall determine
15
which institutions , organizations, associations, and
16
individuals shall be eligible to provide said training.
17
Said instructions and fees associated therewith shall b e
18
identical or similar to those prescribed in section
19
[374.710] 324.2115 for bail bond agents and general bail
20
bond agents.
21
3. In addition to said twenty-four hours of initial
22
minimum training, licensees shall be required to receive
23
eight hours of biennial continuing education of which said
24
instructions and fees shall be identical or similar to those

CCS SS SB 1421 61
25
prescribed in section [374.710] 324.2115 for bail bond
26
agents and general bail bond agents.
27
4. Applicants for surety recovery agents licensing
28
shall b e exempt from said requirements of the twenty-four
29
hours of initial minimum training if applicants provide
30
proof of prior training as a law enforcement officer with at
31
least two years of such service within the ten years prior
32
to the application being submitted to the [department] board.
33
5. The [director] board may refuse to issue any
34
license pursuant to sections [374.783 to 374.789] 324.2169
35
to 324.2187, for any one or any combination of causes stated
36
in section [374.787] 324.2181. The [director] board shall
37
notify the applicant in writin g of the reason or reasons for
38
refusal and shall advise the applicant of the right to file
39
a complaint with the administrative hearing commission to
40
appeal the refusal as provided by chapter 621.
1
[374.785.] 324.2175. For the purpose of surrender of
2
the defendant, a surety r e covery agent may apprehend the
3
defendant anywhere within the state of Missouri before or
4
after the forfeiture of the undertaking without personal
5
liability for false imprisonment or may empower any surety
6
recovery agent to make apprehension by providing written
7
authority endorsed on a certified copy of the undertaking
8
and paying the lawful fees.
1
[374.786.] 324.2178. 1. Every person licensed
2
pursuant to sec tions [374 . 783 to 374.789] 324.2169 to
3
324.2187 shall, before the license renewal date, apply to
4
the [director] board for renewal for the ensuing licensing
5
period. The application shall be made on a form furnished
6
to the a pplicant and shall state the applicant's full name,
7
the applicant's business address, the address at which the
8
applicant resides, the date the applicant first received a

CCS SS SB 1421 62
9
license, and the applicant's surety recovery agent
10
identification number, if any.
11
2. A renewal form shall be mailed to each person
12
license d in this state at the person's last known address.
13
The failure to mail the renewal form or the failure of a
14
person to receive it does not relieve any person of the duty
15
to be licensed and to pay the license fee required nor
16
exempt such person from the penalties provided for failure
17
to be licensed.
18
3. Each applicant for renewal shall accompany such
19
applica t ion with a renewal fee to be paid to the
20
[department] board for the licensing period for which
21
renewal is sought.
22
4. The [director] board may refuse to renew any
23
license required pursuant to sections [374.783 to 374.789]
24
324.2169 to 324.2187 for any one or any combination of
25
causes stated in section [374.787] 324.2181. The [director]
26
board shall notify the applicant in writing o f the reasons
27
for refusal to renew and shall advise the applicant of his
28
or her right to file a complaint with the administrative
29
hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
1
[374.787.] 324.2181. 1. The [director] board may
2
cause a complain t to be f i led with the administrative
3
hearing commission as provided by chapter 621 against any
4
surety recovery agent or any person who has failed to renew
5
or has surrendered his or her license for any one or any
6
combination of the following causes:
7
(1) Violation of any provisions of, or any obligations
8
imposed b y, the laws of this state, [the department of
9
commerce and insurance] board rules and regulations, or
10
aiding or abetting other persons to violate such laws,
11
orders, rules, or regulations;

CCS SS SB 1421 63
12
(2) Final adjudication or a plea of guilty or nolo
13
contende r e in a criminal prosecution under state or federal
14
law for a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude,
15
whether or not a sentence is imposed;
16
(3) Using fraud, deception, misrepresentation, or
17
bribery i n securing a license or in obtaining permission to
18
take any examination required by sections [374.783 to
19
374.789] 324.2169 to 324.2187;
20
(4) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any compensation
21
as a sur e ty recovery agent by means of fraud, deception, or
22
misrepresentation;
23
(5) Acting as a surety recovery agent or aiding or
24
abetting another in acting as a surety recovery agent
25
without a license;
26
(6) Incompetence, misconduct, gross negligence, fraud,
27
or misre p resentation in the performance of the functions or
28
duties of a surety recovery agent;
29
(7) Having a license revoked or suspended that was
30
issued b y another state.
31
2. After the filing of the complaint, the proceedings
32
shall b e conducted in accordance with the provisions of
33
chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
34
commission t h at one or more of the causes stated in
35
subsection 1 of this section have been met, the [director]
36
board may, singly or in combination, censure or place the
37
person named in the complaint on probation under such terms
38
and conditions as the board deems appropriate or suspend or
39
revoke the license [or enter into an agreement for a
40
monetary or other penalty pursuant to section 374.280.
41
3. In lieu of filing a complaint with the
42
adminis t rative hearing commission, the director and the

CCS SS SB 1421 64
43
surety recovery agent may enter into an agreement for a
44
monetary or other penalty pursuant to section 374.280.
45
4. In addition to any other remedies available, the
46
directo r may issue a cease and desist order or may seek an
47
injunction in a court of law pursuant to section 374.046
48
whenever it appears that any person is acting as a surety
49
recovery agent without a license].
1
[374.788.] 324.2184. 1. A [bail bond] surety recovery
2
agent having pro bable gro u nds to believe a subject free on
3
his or her bond has failed to appear as directed by a court,
4
has breached the terms of the subject's surety agreement, or
5
has taken a substantial step toward absconding may utilize
6
all lawful means to apprehend the subject. To surrender a
7
subject to a court, a licensed bail bond or surety recovery
8
agent having probable grounds to believe the subject is free
9
on his or her bond may:
10
(1) Detain the subject in a lawful manner, for a
11
reasonab l e time, provided that in the event travel from
12
another state is involved, the detention period may include
13
reasonable travel time not to exceed seventy-two hours;
14
(2) Transport a subject in a lawful manner from state
15
to state and county to county to a place of authorized
16
surrender; and
17
(3) Enter upon private or public property in a lawful
18
manner t o execute apprehension of a subject.
19
2. A surety recovery agent who apprehends a subject
20
pursuan t to the provisions of subsection 1 of this section
21
shall surrender custody of the subject to the court of
22
jurisdiction.
23
3. When a surety recovery agent is in the process of
24
perform i ng fugitive recovery, a photographic identification
25
card shall be prominently displayed on his or her person.

CCS SS SB 1421 65
1
[374.789.] 324.2187. 1. A person is guilty of a class
2
E felony if he o r she doe s no t hold a valid surety recovery
3
agent license or a bail bond license and commits any of the
4
following acts:
5
(1) Holds himself or herself out to be a licensed
6
surety r e covery agent within this state;
7
(2) Claims that he or she can render surety recovery
8
agent se r vices; or
9
(3) Engages in fugitive recovery in this state.
10
2. A ny person who engages in fugitive recovery in this
11
state a n d wrongfully causes damage to any person or
12
property, including, but not limited to, unlawful
13
apprehension, unlawful detainment, or assault, shall be
14
liable for such damages and may be liable for punitive
15
damages.
1
374.051. 1. Any applicant refused a license or the
2
renewal of a l ice n se by order of the director under
3
[sections 374.755, 374.787, and] section 375.141 may file a
4
petition with the administrative hearing commission alleging
5
that the director has refused the license. The
6
administrative hearing commission shall co n duct hearings and
7
make findings of fact and conclusions of law in determining
8
whether the applicant may be disqualified by statute.
9
Notwithstanding section 621.120, the director shall re tain
10
discretion in refusing a license or renewal and such
11
discretion shall not transfer to the administrative hearing
12
commission.
13
2. If a proceeding is instituted to revoke or suspend
14
a licen s e of any person under [sections 374.755, 374.787,
15
and] section 375.141, the director shall refer the matter to
16
the administrative hearing commission by directing the
17
filing of a complaint. The administrative hearing

CCS SS SB 1421 66
18
commission shall conduct hearings and make findings of fact
19
and conclusions of law in such cases. The director shall
20
have the burden of proving cause for d iscipline. If cause
21
is found, the administrative hearing commission s hall submit
22
its findings of fact and conclusions of law to the director,
23
who may determine appropriate discipline.
24
3. Hearing procedures before the director or the
25
adminis t rative hearing commission and judicial review of the
26
decisions and orders of the director and of the
27
administrative hearing commission, and all other procedural
28
matters under this chapter, shall be governed by the
29
provisions of chapter 536. Hearings before the
30
administrative hearing com m ission shall also be governed by
31
the provisions of chapter 621.
1
454.1050. 1. This section shall be known and may be
2
cited as "Bentl ey a nd Mason's Law".
3
2. If a person has been convicted of, pled guilty to,
4
or ente r ed a plea of nolo contendere to an offense under
5
section 577.010 or 577.012, such offense caused the death of
6
a parent or parents of a child or children, and a surviving
7
parent or guardian files a petition to receive child
8
maintenance from the person, such person shall be ordered by
9
the court to pay child maintenance to the child or children
10
until the child or children:
11
(1) Die;
12
(2) Marry;
13
(3) Enter active military duty;
14
(4) Reach eighteen years of age unless the provisions
15
of subse c tion 3 of this section apply; or
16
(5) Reach twenty-one years of age unless the
17
provisio n s of the maintenance order specifically extend
18
beyond the child's or children's twenty-first birthdays for

CCS SS SB 1421 67
19
reasons provided under subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of
20
this section.
21
3. (1) If the child or children are physically or
22
mentall y inc a pacitated from supporting themselves and
23
insolvent and unmarried, the court may extend the
24
maintenance obligation past the child's or children's
25
eighteenth birthday.
26
(2) (a) If the child or children reach eighteen years
27
of age an d ar e enrolled in and attending a secondary school
28
program of instruction, maintenance shall continue, if the
29
child or children continue to attend and progress toward
30
completion of such program, until the child or children
31
complete such program or reach twenty-one years of age,
32
whichever first occurs.
33
(b) If the child or children are enrolled in an
34
institut i on of vocational or higher education no later than
35
October first following graduation from a secondary school
36
or completion of a graduation equivalence degree program and
37
so long as the child or children enroll for and complete at
38
least twelve hours of credit each semester, not including
39
the summer semester, at an institution of vocational or
40
higher education and achieve grades sufficient to reenroll
41
at such institution, maintenance shall continue until the
42
child or children complete their education or until the
43
child or children reach twenty-one years of age, whichever
44
first occurs. To remain eligible for such continued
45
maintenance, a t the beginning of each semester the child or
46
children shall submit to the court a transcript or similar
47
official document provided by the institution of vocational
48
or higher education that includes the courses the child or
49
children are enrolled in and have completed for each term,
50
the grades and credits received for each such course, and an

CCS SS SB 1421 68
51
official document from the institution listing the courses
52
that the child or children are enrolled in for the upcoming
53
term and the number of credits for each such course. When
54
enrolled in at least twelve credit hours, if the chi l d or
55
children receive failing grades in half or more of the
56
child's or children's courseload in any one semester,
57
payment of maintenance for the child or children receiving
58
the failing grades may be terminated and shall not be
59
eligible for reinstatement. Upon request for notification
60
of the child's or children's grades by the court, the child
61
or children shall produce the required documents to the
62
court within thirty days of receipt of grades from the
63
education institution. If the child or children fail to
64
produce the required do cuments, payment of maintenance may
65
terminate without the accrual of any maintenance arrearage
66
and shall not be eligible for reinstatement. If the
67
circumstances of the child or children manif e stly dictate,
68
the court may waive the October first deadline for
69
enrollment required by this subdivision. As used in this
70
subdivision, "institution of vocational e ducation" means any
71
postsecondary training or schooling for which the child is
72
assessed a fee and attends classes regularly. "Higher
73
education" means any community college, colle g e, or
74
university at which the child attends classes regularly. A
75
child or children who have been diagnosed with a
76
developmental disability, as defined under section 630.005,
77
or whose physical disability or diagnosed health problem
78
limits the child's or children's ability to carry the number
79
of credit hours prescribed in this subdivision, shall remain
80
eligible for maintenance so long as such child or children
81
are enrolled in and attending an institution of vocational
82
or higher education and the child or children continue to

CCS SS SB 1421 69
83
meet the other requirements of this subdivision. A child or
84
children who are employed at least fifteen hours per week
85
during the semester may take as few as nine credit hours per
86
semester and remain eligible for maintenance so long as all
87
other requirements of this subdivision are complied with.
88
4. The court shall order the person who was convicted,
89
pled gu i lty to, or entered a plea of nolo contendere to an
90
offense under section 577.010 or 577.012 as provided under
91
subsection 2 of this section to pay maintenance in an amount
92
that is reasonable or necessary for the maintenance of the
93
child or children after considering all relevant factors,
94
including:
95
(1) The financial needs and resources of the child or
96
children ;
97
(2) The financial resources and needs of the surviving
98
parent o r , if no other parent is alive or capable of caring
99
for the child or children, the guardian of the child or
100
children, including the state if the state is the guardian;
101
(3) The standard of living the child or children would
102
have enj o yed;
103
(4) The physical and emotional condition of the child
104
or child r en and the child's or children's educational needs;
105
(5) The child's or children's physical and legal
106
custody a rrangements; and
107
(6) The reasonable work-related child care expenses of
108
the surv i ving parent or guardian.
109
5. In addition to the relevant factors listed under
110
subsect i on 4 of this section, the court shall consider the
111
guidelines set out under subsection 8 of section 452.340 and
112
Missouri supreme court civil procedure rule form 14 in
113
determining the amount reasonable or necessary for the
114
maintenance of the child or children.

CCS SS SB 1421 70
115
6. (1) The court shall order that child maintenance
116
payment s be m ade to the circuit clerk as trustee for
117
remittance to the surviving parent or guardian entitled to
118
receive the payments. The circuit clerk shall remit such
119
payments to the surviv ing parent or guardian within three
120
working days of receipt by the circuit clerk. Circuit
121
clerks shall deposit all receipts no later th a n the next
122
working day after receipt.
123
(2) As an alternative to subdivision (1) of this
124
subsecti o n, the court may, upon its own motion, order that
125
maintenance payments be made to the family support payment
126
center established under section 454.530 as trustee for
127
remittance to the surviving parent or guardian. However,
128
the court shall not order payments to be made t o the payment
129
center if the family support division notifies the court
130
that such payments shall not be made to the center. In such
131
cases, payments shall be made to the clerk as trust e e until
132
the division notifies the court that payments shall be
133
directed to the payment center.
134
7. In addition to any other remedy provided by law for
135
the enf o rcement of child maintenance, if a maintenance order
136
has been entered, the director of the family support
137
division or the director's designee shall issue an order
138
directing any employer or other payer of the person required
139
to pay child maintenance under this section to withhold and
140
pay over to the family support division or the clerk of the
141
circuit court in the county in which a trusteeship is or
142
will be established moneys due or to become due to the
143
surviving parent or guardian for the child or children in an
144
amount not to exceed federal wage garnishment limitations.
145
8. If a person ordered to pay child maintenance under
146
this se c tion is incarcerated and unable to pay the required

CCS SS SB 1421 71
147
maintenance, the person shall have up to one year after the
148
release from incarceration to begin payment, including any
149
arrearage. If any obligation under this section is to
150
terminate a s provided under subsection 2 of this section but
151
the person's obligation is not paid in full, payments shall
152
continue until the entire arrearage is paid.
153
9. (1) If the surviving parent or guardian of the
154
child o r chi l dren brings a civil action on behalf of such
155
child or children against the person who was convicted of,
156
pled guilty to, or entered a plea of nolo contendere to an
157
offense under section 577.010 or 577.012 prior to any child
158
maintenance order under this section and the surviving
159
parent or guardian obtains a judgment in his or her favor in
160
the civil suit, no maintenance shall be ordered under this
161
section.
162
(2) If the court orders child maintenance under this
163
section b ut the surviving parent or guardian brings a civil
164
action and obtains a judgment on behalf of such child or
165
children in his or her favor, the child maintenance order
166
shall offset the judgment awarded in the civil action.
167
(3) No funds received under section 595.045 shall
168
result i n a reduction of an amount provided by a child
169
maintenance order under this section.
170
10. The provisions of any order respecting maintenance
171
under th i s section may be modified only upon a showing of
172
changed circumstances so substantial and continuing as to
173
make the terms unreasonable.
1
557.035. 1. For all violations of section 565.054 or
2
565.090, subd i vis i on (1) of subsection 1 of section 569.100,
3
or subdivision (1), (2), (3), (4), (6), (7) or (8) of
4
subsection 1 of section 571.030, which the state believes to
5
be knowingly motivated because of race, color, religion,

CCS SS SB 1421 72
6
national origin, sex, sexual orientation or disability of
7
the victim or victims, the state may charge the offense or
8
offenses under this section, and the violation is a class D
9
felony.
10
2. For all violations of section 565.056; subdivision
11
(1) of s ubsection 1 of section 569.090; section 565.097;
12
subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 569.120; section
13
569.140; or section 574.050; which the state believes to be
14
knowingly motivated because of race, color, religion,
15
national origin, sex, sexual orientation or disability of
16
the victim or victims, the state may charge the offense or
17
offenses under this section, and the violation is a class E
18
felony.
19
3. The court shall assess punishment in all of the
20
cases i n which the state pleads and proves any of the
21
motivating factors listed in this section.
1
565.097. 1. A person commits the offense of masked
2
intimidation i f t h e person intentionally harasses,
3
intimidates, or threatens any other person while hiding or
4
concealing their face with a mask, hood, or any other
5
article or device for the purpose of concealing their
6
identity and with the intent to place another person in
7
reasonable fear for their physical safety.
8
2. A person who commits the offense of masked
9
intimid a tion shall be guilty of a class E felony for the
10
first offense, a class D felony for the second offense, and
11
a class C felony for a third or subsequent offense.
12
3. This section shall not apply to any person wearing
13
a mask o r otherwise covering one's face for any purpose
14
other than a purpose specified in subsection 1 of this
15
section, in cases where a person is wearing:

CCS SS SB 1421 73
16
(1) A mask or face covering on or near the occasion of
17
a holida y , celebration, or other event involving costumes;
18
(2) A mask, hood, article, or other device for the
19
purpose o f ensuring the physical safety of the wearer or
20
because of the nature of the person's occupation, trade, or
21
profession;
22
(3) A mask, hood, article, or other device for the
23
purpose o f protection from the weather elements or while
24
participating in a winter sport;
25
(4) A mask, hood, article, or other device in an
26
artistic or theatrical production or celebration;
27
(5) A gas mask or other protective facial covering for
28
the purp o ses of protection during or related to emergency
29
situations or during emergency management drills;
30
(6) A mask for the purpose of ensuring one's physical
31
health a n d safety or the health and safety of others,
32
including, but not limited to, limiting the spread of
33
airborne illnesses; or
34
(7) Any garb for religious purposes.
35
4. N othing in this section shall be construed to
36
diminis h or infringe upon any right protected under the
37
First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.
38
5. For purposes of this section, the following terms
39
mean:
40
(1) "Harass", engaging in a knowing and willful
41
pattern o f conduct directed at a particular person or
42
particular group of persons that is intended to cause that
43
person or that group of persons to reasonably fear for their
44
safety or suffer substantial emotional distress;
45
(2) "Intimidate", willfully and substantially
46
interfer i ng, by threats, intimidation, or coercion, with the
47
exercise or enjoyment by any other person of rights secured

CCS SS SB 1421 74
48
by the constitution or laws of the United States, or of
49
rights secured by the constitution or laws of this state,
50
because of that person or person's actual or perceived race,
51
color, religion, national origin, ethnicity, sex, gender,
52
gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, or
53
disability;
54
(3) "Threaten", communication with the clear intention
55
to cause imminent physical injury to another person.
1
569.086. 1. As used in this section, "critical
2
infrastructur e fa c ility" means any of the following
3
facilities that are under construction or operational: a
4
petroleum or alumina refinery; critical electric
5
infrastructure, as defined in 18 CFR [Section 118.113(c)(3)]
6
Section 388.113(c)(3) including, but not limited to, an
7
electrical power generating facility, substation, switching
8
station, electrical control center, or electric power lines
9
and associated equipment infrastructure; a chemical,
10
polymer, or rubber manufacturing facility; a water intake
11
structure, water storage facility, water treatment facility,
12
wastewater treatment plant, wastewater pumping facility, or
13
pump station; a natural gas compressor station; a liquid
14
natural gas terminal or storage facility; a
15
telecommunications central switching office; wireline or
16
wireless telecommunications networks, infrastructure, or
17
facilities, including cell towers, telephone poles and
18
lines, including fiber optic lines; a port, railroad
19
switching yard, railroad tracks, trucking terminal, or other
20
freight transportation facility; a gas processing plant,
21
including a plant used in the processing, treatment, or
22
fractionation of natural gas or natural gas liquids; a
23
transmission facility used by a federally licensed radio or
24
television station; a steelmaking facility that uses an

CCS SS SB 1421 75
25
electric arc furnace to make steel; a facility identified
26
and regulated by the United States Department of Homeland
27
Security Chemical Facility Anti-Terrorism Standards (CFATS)
28
program; a dam that is regulated by the state or federal
29
government; a natural gas distribution utility facility
30
including, but not limited to, natural gas distribution and
31
transmission mains and services, pipeline interconnections,
32
a city gate or town border station, metering station,
33
aboveground piping, a regulator station, and a natural gas
34
storage facility; a crude oil or refined products storage
35
and distribution facility including, but not limited to,
36
valve sites, pipeline interconnection, pump station,
37
metering station, below or aboveground pipeline or piping
38
and truck loading or offloading facility, a grain mill or
39
processing facility; [a] networks and facilities used in the
40
generation, transmission, or distribution [system] of
41
broadband internet access; or any aboveground portion of an
42
oil, gas, hazardous liquid or chemical pipeline, tank,
43
railroad facility, or other storage facility that is
44
enclosed by a fence, other physical barrier, or is clearly
45
marked with signs prohibiting trespassing, that are
46
obviously designed to exclude intruders.
47
2. A person commits the offense of trespass on a
48
critical infrastructure facility if he or she purposely
49
trespasses or enters property containing a critical
50
infrastructure facility without the permission of the owner
51
of the property or lawful occupant thereof. The offense of
52
trespass on a critical infrastructure facil i ty is a class B
53
misdemeanor. [If it is determined that the intent of the
54
trespasser i s to damage, destroy, or tamper with equipment,
55
or impede or inhibit operations of the facility, the person
56
shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

CCS SS SB 1421 76
57
3. A person commits the offense of damage of a
58
critica l infrastructure if he or she purposely damages,
59
destroys, or tampers with equipment in a critical
60
infrastructure facility. The offense of damage of a
61
critical infrastructure f acility is a class D felony.
62
4.] 3. This section shall not apply to conduct
63
protecte d u n der the Constitution of the United States, the
64
Constitution of [the state of] Missouri, or a state or
65
federal law or rule.
1
569.117. 1. A person commits the offense of damage of
2
a critical in f ras t ructure facility, as defined in section
3
569.086, if he or she:
4
(1) Purposely damages, destroys, or tampers with
5
equipmen t in a critical infrastructure facility; or
6
(2) Recklessly damages, destroys, or tampers with a
7
critical infrastructure facility, or removes any component
8
of the critical infrastructure facility, excluding equipment.
9
2. Except as provided under subsection 3 of this
10
section , the offense of damage of a critical infrastructure
11
facility under:
12
(1) Subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section is
13
a class D felony; or
14
(2) Subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section is
15
a:
16
(a) Class A misdemeanor if the damage is under seven
17
hundred f ifty dollars;
18
(b) Class E felony if the damage is seven hundred
19
fifty do l lars or more but less than twenty-five thousand
20
dollars; or
21
(c) Class D felony if the damage is twenty-five
22
thousand dollars or more.

CCS SS SB 1421 77
23
3. If the damage to a critical infrastructure facility
24
causes i nterruption, impairment, or degradation of service,
25
the offense of damage of a critical infrastructure facility
26
shall be a class C felony regardless of value.
27
4. The value of damages under this section shall be
28
determi n ed under the provisions of section 570.020.
29
5. (1) Any person who commits a violation under this
30
section shal l be required to make restitution and perform
31
community service as provided in this subsection.
32
(2) Restitution shall be made under the provisions of
33
section 5 59.105.
34
(3) Community service shall be imposed as follows:
35
(a) One hundred hours for the first offense;
36
(b) Two hundred hours for the second offense; or
37
(c) Up to three hundred hours for the third or any
38
subseque n t offense.
1
569.119. 1. As used in this section, the following
2
terms mean:
3
(1) "Copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or
4
telecomm u nications material", any insulated or noninsulated
5
copper, brass, aluminum, fiber-optic, or telecommunications
6
wire, cable, pipe, tubing, power inverter, bus bar,
7
broadband cable, fiber-optic line, or any material
8
containing copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, glass, or metal
9
components that is commonly used in construction, electrical
10
systems, telecommunications networks, broadband
11
infrastructure, utilities, or related commercial or
12
industrial applications;
13
(2) "Critical infrastructure facility", the same
14
meaning a s defined under section 569.086.

CCS SS SB 1421 78
15
2. A person commits the offense of unauthorized
16
possess i on of certain copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or
17
telecommunications material if the person:
18
(1) Knowingly possesses copper, brass, aluminum,
19
fiber, o r telecommunications material; and
20
(2) Is not a person authorized to possess such
21
material as provided under subsection 3 of this section.
22
3. Subject to subsection 4 of this section, the
23
followi n g persons are authorized to possess copper, brass,
24
aluminum, fiber, or telecommunications material:
25
(1) The owner of the material;
26
(2) A public utility, rural electric cooperative,
27
municipa l utility, or common carrier;
28
(3) A telecommunications provider, internet service
29
provider , cable service provider, or video service provider;
30
(4) A manufacturing, industrial, commercial, retail,
31
or simil a r business that sells or uses such material in the
32
ordinary course of business;
33
(5) A carrier-for-hire acting in the course and scope
34
of the c a rrier's business and possessing appropriate
35
documentation, including a bill of lading or contract
36
verifying transport information;
37
(6) A scrap metal or metal recycling dealer under
38
chapter 4 07 and acting within the ordinary course of
39
business;
40
(7) A person acting in the ordinary course of lawful
41
construc t ion, remodeling, demolition, or salvage work who
42
lawfully acquires the material through such activities; or
43
(8) Any agent, employee, subcontractor, or
44
represen t ative of a person described in subdivisions (1) to
45
(7) of this subsection who is acting within the course and
46
scope of such authority.

CCS SS SB 1421 79
47
4. The authorization provided under subsection 3 of
48
this se c tion does not apply to a person who knows that the
49
copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or telecommunications
50
material was unlawfully obtained.
51
5. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this
52
subsect i on, t he offense of unauthorized possession of
53
certain copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or
54
telecommunications material is a class E felony.
55
(2) The offense of unauthorized possession of certain
56
copper, b rass, aluminum, fiber, or telecommunications
57
material is a class D felony if it is shown at trial that:
58
(a) The material was unlawfully obtained from a
59
critical infrastructure facility;
60
(b) The person has a prior conviction for any offense
61
involvin g theft, property damage, tampering, receiving
62
stolen property, or unauthorized possession of copper,
63
brass, aluminum, fiber, or telecommunications material; or
64
(c) The person conspired with or acted in concert with
65
another t o commit theft, property damage, tampering, or
66
receiving stolen property involving such material.
67
6. If conduct constituting an offense under this
68
section also constitutes an offense under any other
69
provision of law, the person may be prosecuted under either
70
or both provisions subject to the provisions of section
71
556.041.
1
570.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms
2
mean:
3
(1) "Adulterated", varying from the standard of
4
composit i on or quality prescribed by statute or lawfully
5
promulgated administrative regulations of this state
6
lawfully filed, or if none, as set by commercial usage;

CCS SS SB 1421 80
7
(2) "Appropriate", to take, obtain, use, transfer,
8
conceal, retain or dispose;
9
(3) "Check", a check or other similar sight order or
10
any othe r form of presentment involving the transmission of
11
account information for the payment of money;
12
(4) "Closed-loop gift card", a card, code, or device
13
that is:
14
(a) Issued to a consumer on a prepaid basis primarily
15
for pers o nal, family, or household purposes in a specified
16
monetary amount, regardless of whether that amount may be
17
increased or reloaded in exchange for payment; and
18
(b) Redeemable upon presentation by a consumer at a
19
single m e rchant or group of affiliated merchants;
20
(5) "Coercion", a threat, however communicated:
21
(a) To commit any offense; or
22
(b) To inflict physical injury in the future on the
23
person t h reatened or another; or
24
(c) To accuse any person of any offense; or
25
(d) To expose any person to hatred, contempt or
26
ridicule ; or
27
(e) To harm the credit or business reputation of any
28
person; o r
29
(f) To take or withhold action as a public servant, or
30
to cause a public servant to take or withhold action; or
31
(g) To inflict any other harm which would not benefit
32
the acto r . A threat of accusation, lawsuit or other
33
invocation of official action is justified and not coercion
34
if the property sought to be obtained by virtue of such
35
threat was honestly claimed as restitution or
36
indemnification for harm done in the circumstances to which
37
the accusation, exposure, lawsuit or other official action
38
relates, or as compensation for property or lawful service.

CCS SS SB 1421 81
39
The defendant shall have the burden of injecting the issue
40
of justification as to any threat;
41
[(5)] (6) "Credit device", a writing, card, code,
42
number or othe r device purporting to evidence an undertaking
43
to pay for property or services delivered or rendered to or
44
upon the order of a designated person or bearer;
45
[(6)] (7) "Dealer", a person in the business of buying
46
and sellin g go o ds;
47
[(7)] (8) "Debit device", a writing, card, code,
48
number or othe r device, other than a check, draft or similar
49
paper instrument, by the use of which a person may initiate
50
an electronic fund transfer, including but not limited to
51
devices that enable electronic transfers of benefits to
52
public assistance recipients;
53
[(8)] (9) "Deceit or deceive", making a representation
54
which is f alse and which the actor does not believe to be
55
true and upon which the victim relies, as to a matter of
56
fact, law, value, intention or other state of mind, or
57
concealing a material fact as to the terms of a contract or
58
agreement. The term "deceit" does not, however, include
59
falsity as to matters having no pecuniary significance, or
60
puffing by statements unlikely to deceive ordinary persons
61
in the group addressed. Deception as to the actor's
62
intention to perform a p romise shall not be inferred from
63
the fact alone that he did not subsequently perform the
64
promise;
65
[(9)] (10) "Deprive":
66
(a) T o wit h hold property from the owner permanently; or
67
(b) To restore property only upon payment of reward or
68
other co m pensation; or
69
(c) To use or dispose of property in a manner that
70
makes re c overy of the property by the owner unlikely;

CCS SS SB 1421 82
71
[(10)] (11) "Electronic benefits card" or "EBT card",
72
a debit card use d to access food stamps or cash benefits
73
issued by the department of social services;
74
[(11)] (12) "Financial institution", a bank, trust
75
company, sav ings and loan association, or credit union;
76
[(12)] (13) "Food stamps", the nutrition assistance
77
program in M isso u ri that provides food and aid to low-income
78
individuals who are in need of benefits to purchase food
79
operated by the United States Department of Agriculture
80
(USDA) in conjunction with the department of social services;
81
[(13)] (14) "Forcibly steals", a person, in the course
82
of stealing, use s or threatens the immediate use of physical
83
force upon another person for the purpose of:
84
(a) Preventing or overcoming resistance to the taking
85
of the p r operty or to the retention thereof immediately
86
after the taking; or
87
(b) Compelling the owner of such property or another
88
person t o deliver up the property or to engage in other
89
conduct which aids in the commission of the theft;
90
(15) "Gift card", a physical or digital closed-loop
91
gift card or open-loop gift card that is either activated or
92
inactivated;
93
(16) "Gift card holder", any person or party to whom a
94
physical o r virtual gift card is issued through a purchase,
95
or any person or party who receives a gift card from a
96
willing party;
97
(17) "Gift card issuer", any person who issues a gift
98
card or t h e agent of that person with respect to a gift card;
99
(18) "Gift card redemption information", information
100
unique to each gift card that allows the gift card holder to
101
access, transfer, or spend the funds on that gift card;

CCS SS SB 1421 83
102
(19) "Gift card seller", a merchant that is engaged in
103
the busine ss of selling open-loop or closed-loop gift cards
104
to consumers with the approval or authorization of the gift
105
card issuer;
106
[(14)] (20) "Internet service", an interactive
107
computer ser vice or system or an information service,
108
system, or access software provider that provides or enables
109
computer access by multiple users to a computer server, and
110
includes, but is not limited to, an information service,
111
system, or access software provider that provides access to
112
a network system commonly known as the internet, or any
113
comparable system or service and also includes, but is not
114
limited to, a world wide web page, newsgroup, message board,
115
mailing list, or chat area on any interactive computer
116
service or system or other online service;
117
[(15)] (21) "Means of identification", anything used
118
by a person as a means to uniquely distinguish himself or
119
herself;
120
[(16)] (22) "Merchant", a person who deals in goods of
121
the kind or othe r wise by his or her occupation holds oneself
122
out as having knowledge or skill peculiar to the practices
123
or goods involved in the transaction or to whom such
124
knowledge or skill may be attributed by his or her
125
employment of an agent or broker or other intermediary who
126
by his or her occupation holds oneself out as having such
127
knowledge or skill;
128
[(17)] (23) "Mislabeled", varying from the standard of
129
truth or dis clos u re in labeling prescribed by statute or
130
lawfully promulgated administrative regulations of this
131
state lawfully filed, or if none, as set by commercial
132
usage; or represented as being another person's product,

CCS SS SB 1421 84
133
though otherwise accurately labeled as to quality and
134
quantity;
135
(24) "Open-loop gift card", a card, code, or device
136
that is:
137
(a) Issued to a consumer on a prepaid basis primarily
138
for pers o nal, family, or household purposes in a specified
139
monetary amount, regardless of whether that amount may be
140
increased or reloaded in exchange for payment;
141
(b) Branded with a major payment network; and
142
(c) Redeemable upon presentation at multiple
143
unaffili a ted merchants for goods or services;
144
[(18)] (25) "Pharmacy", any building, warehouse,
145
physician's offi c e, hospital, pharmaceutical house or other
146
structure used in whole or in part for the sale, storage, or
147
dispensing of any controlled substance as defined in chapter
148
195;
149
[(19)] (26) "Property", anything of value, whether
150
real or pers onal , tangible or intangible, in possession or
151
in action, and shall include but not be limited to the
152
evidence of a debt actually executed but not delivered or
153
issued as a valid instrument;
154
[(20)] (27) "Public assistance benefits", anything of
155
value, inclu ding money, food, EBT cards, food stamps,
156
commodities, clothing, utilities, utilities payments,
157
shelter, drugs and medicine, materials, goods, and any
158
service including institutional care, medical care, dental
159
care, child care, psychiatric and psychological service,
160
rehabilitation instruction, training, transitional
161
assistance, or counseling, received by or paid on behalf of
162
any person under chapters 198, 205, 207, 208, 209, and 660,
163
or benefits, programs, and services provided or administered

CCS SS SB 1421 85
164
by the Missouri department of social services or any of its
165
divisions;
166
[(21)] (28) "Services" includes transportation,
167
telephone, e lect r icity, gas, water, or other public service,
168
cable television service, video service, voice over internet
169
protocol service, or internet service, accommodation in
170
hotels, restaurants or elsewhere, admission to exhibitions
171
and use of vehicles;
172
[(22)] (29) "Stealing-related offense", federal and
173
state violat ions of criminal statutes against stealing,
174
robbery, or buying or receiving stolen property and shall
175
also include municipal ordinances against the same if the
176
offender was either represented by counsel or knowingly
177
waived counsel in writing and the judge accepting the plea
178
or making the findings was a licensed attorney at the time
179
of the court proceedings;
180
[(23)] (30) "Teller machine", an automated teller
181
machine (ATM ) or interactive teller machine (ITM) is a
182
remote computer terminal owned or controlled by a financial
183
institution or a private business that allows individuals to
184
obtain financial services including obtaining cash,
185
transferring or transmitting money or digital currencies,
186
payment of bills, or loading money or digital currency to a
187
payment card or other device without physical in-person
188
assistance from another person. "Teller machine" does not
189
include personally owned electr o nic devices used to access
190
financial services;
191
[(24)] (31) "Video service", the provision of video
192
programming prov i ded through wireline facilities located at
193
least in part in the public right-of-way without regard to
194
delivery technology, including internet protocol technology
195
whether provided as part of a tier, on demand, or a per-

CCS SS SB 1421 86
196
channel basis. This definition includes cable service as
197
defined by 47 U .S.C. Section 522(6), but does not include
198
any video programming provided by a commercial mobile
199
service provider as "commercial mobile service" is defined
200
in 47 U.S.C. Section 332(d), or any video programming
201
provided solely as part of and via a service that enables
202
users to access content, information, [electronic mail]
203
email, or other services offered over the public internet,
204
and includes microwave television transmission, from a
205
multipoint distribution service not capable of reception by
206
conventional television receivers without the use of special
207
equipment;
208
[(25)] (32) "Voice over internet protocol service", a
209
service that :
210
(a) Enables real-time, two-way voice communication;
211
(b) Requires a broadband connection from the user's
212
location ;
213
(c) Requires internet protocol-compatible customer
214
premises equipment; and
215
(d) Permits users generally to receive calls that
216
originat e on the public switched telephone network and to
217
terminate calls to the public switched telephone network;
218
[(26)] (33) "Writing" includes printing, any other
219
method of re cord i ng information, money, coins, negotiable
220
instruments, tokens, stamps, seals, credit cards, badges,
221
trademarks and any other symbols of value, right, privilege
222
or identification.
1
570.137. 1. A person commits the offense of gift card
2
fraud if he o r sh e knowingly:
3
(1) Alters or tampers with a gift card or its
4
packagin g ;

CCS SS SB 1421 87
5
(2) Devises a scheme to obtain a gift card or gift
6
card red e mption information from a gift card holder, gift
7
card issuer, or gift card seller by means of deceit; or
8
(3) Uses, for the purpose of obtaining money, goods,
9
services , or anything else of value, a gift card or gift
10
card redemption information that has been obtained in
11
violation of this subsection.
12
2. The offense of gift card fraud is a class C felony
13
if the v alue of the gift card; gift card redemption
14
information; or money, goods, services, or other thing of
15
value obtained as a result of violating subsection 1 of this
16
section is twenty-five thousand dollars or more.
17
3. The offense of gift card fraud is a class D felony
18
if the v alue of the gift card; gift card redemption
19
information; or money, goods, services, or other thing of
20
value obtained as a result of violating subsection 1 of this
21
section is seven hundred fifty dollars or more but less than
22
twenty-five thousand dollars.
23
4. The offense of gift card fraud is a class A
24
misdeme a nor if the value of the gift card; gift card
25
redemption information; or money, goods, services, or other
26
thing of value obtained as a result of violating subsection
27
1 of this section is less than seven hundred fifty dollars.
28
For the purpose of determining the value of a gift card
29
under this section, "value" shall mean the greatest amount
30
of economic loss the owner of the property might reasonably
31
suffer, including, in the case of a gift card, the full
32
monetary face value or potential value for variable load
33
gift cards.
1
571.030. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
2
use of weapon s , e x cept as otherwise provided by sections

CCS SS SB 1421 88
3
571.101 to 571.121 and sections 571.205 to 571.230, if he or
4
she knowingly:
5
(1) Carries concealed upon or about his or her person
6
a knife, a firearm, a blackjack or any other weapon readily
7
capable of lethal use into any area where firearms are
8
restricted under section 571.107; or
9
(2) Sets a spring gun; or
10
(3) Discharges or shoots a firearm into a dwelling
11
house, a railroad train, boat, aircraft, or motor vehicle as
12
defined in section 302.010, or any building or structure
13
used for the assembling of people; or
14
(4) Exhibits, in the presence of one or more persons,
15
any weap o n readily capable of lethal use in an angry or
16
threatening manner; or
17
(5) Has a firearm or projectile weapon readily capable
18
of letha l use on his or her person, while he or she is
19
intoxicated, and handles or otherwise uses such firearm or
20
projectile weapon in either a negligent or unlawful manner
21
or discharges such firearm or projectile weapon unless
22
acting in self-defense; or
23
(6) Discharges a firearm within one hundred yards of
24
any occu p ied schoolhouse, courthouse, or church building; or
25
(7) Discharges or shoots a firearm at a mark, at any
26
object, o r at random, on, along or across a public highway
27
or discharges or shoots a firearm into any outbuilding; or
28
(8) Carries a firearm or any other weapon readily
29
capable o f lethal use into any church or place where people
30
have assembled for worship, or into any election precinct on
31
any election day, or into any building owned or occupied by
32
any agency of the federal government, state government, or
33
political subdivision thereof; or

CCS SS SB 1421 89
34
(9) Discharges or shoots a firearm at or from a motor
35
vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, discharges or shoots
36
a firearm at any person, or at any other motor vehicle, or
37
at any building or habitable structure, unless the person
38
was lawfully acting in self-defense; or
39
(10) Carries a firearm, whether loaded or unloaded, or
40
any other weapon readily capable of lethal use into any
41
school, onto any school bus, or onto the premises of any
42
function or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school
43
officials or the district school board; or
44
(11) Possesses a firearm while also knowingly in
45
possessio n of a controlled substance that is sufficient for
46
a felony violation of section 579.015.
47
2. Subdivisions (1), (8), and (10) of subsection 1 of
48
this se c tion shall not apply to the persons described in
49
this subsection, regardless of whether such uses are
50
reasonably associated with or are necessary to the
51
fulfillment of such person's official duties except as
52
otherwise provided in this subsection. Subdivisions (3),
53
(4), (6), (7), and (9) of subsection 1 of this section shall
54
not apply to or affect any of the following persons, when
55
such uses are reasonably associated with or are necessary to
56
the fulfillment of such person's official duties, except as
57
otherwise provided in this subsection:
58
(1) All state, county and municipal peace officers who
59
have com p leted the training required by the police officer
60
standards and training commission pursuant to sections
61
590.030 to 590.050 and who possess the duty and power of
62
arrest for violation of the general criminal laws of the
63
state or for violation of ordinances of counties or
64
municipalities of the state, whether such officers are on or
65
off duty, and whether such officers are within or outside of

CCS SS SB 1421 90
66
the law enforcement agency's jurisdiction, or all qualified
67
retired peace officers, as defined in subsection 12 of this
68
section, and who carry the identification defined in
69
subsection 13 of this section, or any person summoned by
70
such officers to assist in making arrests or preserving the
71
peace while actually engaged in assisting such officer;
72
(2) Wardens, superintendents and keepers of prisons,
73
penitent i aries, jails and other institutions for the
74
detention of persons accused or convicted of crime;
75
(3) Members of the Armed Forces or National Guard
76
while pe r forming their official duty;
77
(4) Those persons vested by Article V, Section 1 of
78
the Cons t itution of Missouri with the judicial power of the
79
state and those persons vested by Article III of the
80
Constitution of the United States with the judicial power of
81
the United States, the members of the federal judiciary;
82
(5) Any person whose bona fide duty is to execute
83
process, civil or criminal;
84
(6) Any federal probation officer or federal flight
85
deck off i cer as defined under the federal flight deck
86
officer program, 49 U.S.C. Section 44921, regardless of
87
whether such officers are on duty, or within the law
88
enforcement agency's jurisdiction;
89
(7) Any state probation or parole officer, including
90
supervis o rs and members of the parole board;
91
(8) Any corporate security advisor meeting the
92
definiti o n and fulfilling the requirements of the
93
regulations established by the department of public safety
94
under section 590.750;
95
(9) Any coroner, deputy coroner, medical examiner, or
96
assistan t medical examiner;

CCS SS SB 1421 91
97
(10) Any municipal or county prosecuting attorney or
98
assistant prosecuting attorney; any circuit attorney or
99
assistant circuit attorney; any municipal, associate, or
100
circuit judge; the attorney general and any assistant
101
attorney general; or any person appointed by a court to be a
102
special prosecutor who has completed the firearms safety
103
training course required under subsection 2 of section
104
571.111;
105
(11) Any member of a fire department or fire
106
protectio n district who is employed on a full-time basis as
107
a fire investigator and who has a valid concealed carry
108
endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a valid
109
concealed carry permit under section 571.111 when such uses
110
are reasonably associated with or are necessary to the
111
fulfillment of such person's official duties; and
112
(12) Upon the written approval of the governing body
113
of a fire department or fire protection district, any paid
114
fire department or fire protection district member who is
115
employed on a full-time basis and who has a valid concealed
116
carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a
117
valid concealed carry permit, when such uses are reasonably
118
associated with or are necessary to the fulfillment of such
119
person's official duties.
120
3. Subdivisions (1), (5), (8), and (10) of subsection
121
1 of th i s section do not apply when the actor is
122
transporting such weapons in a nonfunctioning state or in an
123
unloaded state when ammunition is not readily accessible or
124
when such weapons are not readily accessible. Subdivision
125
(1) of subsection 1 of this section does not a pply to any
126
person nineteen years of age or older or eighteen years of
127
age or older and a member of the United States Armed Forces,
128
or honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces,

CCS SS SB 1421 92
129
transporting a concealable firearm in the passenger
130
compartment of a motor vehicle, so long as such concealable
131
firearm is otherwise lawfully possessed, nor when the actor
132
is also in possession of an exposed firearm or projectile
133
weapon for the lawful pursuit of game, or is in his or her
134
dwelling unit or upon premises over which the actor has
135
possession, authority or control, or is traveling in a
136
continuous journey peaceably through this state.
137
Subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of this section does not
138
apply if the firearm is otherwise lawfully possessed by a
139
person while traversing school premises for the purposes of
140
transporting a student to or from school, or possessed by an
141
adult for the purposes of facilitation of a school-
142
sanctioned firearm-related event or club event.
143
4. Subdivisions (1), (8), and (10) of subsection 1 of
144
this se c tion shall not apply to any person who has a valid
145
concealed carry permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101
146
to 571.121 or sections 571.205 to 571.230, a valid concealed
147
carry endorsement issued before August 28, 2013, or a valid
148
permit or endorsement to carry concealed firearms issued by
149
another state or political subdivision of another state.
150
5. Subdivisions (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and
151
(10) of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to
152
persons who are engaged in a lawful act of defense pursuant
153
to section 563.031.
154
6. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
155
the con t rary, the state shall not prohibit any state
156
employee from having a firearm in the employee's vehicle on
157
the state's property provided that the vehicle is locked and
158
the firearm is not visible. This subsection shall only
159
apply to the state as an em p loyer when the state employee's
160
vehicle is on property owned or leased by the state and the

CCS SS SB 1421 93
161
state employee is conducting activities within the scope of
162
his or her employment. For the purposes of this subsection,
163
"state employee" means an employee of the executive,
164
legislative, or judicial branch of the government of the
165
state of Missouri.
166
7. (1) Subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of this
167
section shal l not apply to a person who is a school officer
168
commissioned by the district school board under section
169
162.215 or who is a school protection officer, as described
170
under section 160.665.
171
(2) Nothing in this section shall make it unlawful for
172
a studen t to actually participate in school-sanctioned gun
173
safety courses, student military or ROTC courses, or other
174
school-sponsored or club-sponsored firearm-related events,
175
provided the student does not carry a firearm or other
176
weapon readily capable of lethal use into any school, onto
177
any school bus, or onto the premises of any other function
178
or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school officials or
179
the district school board.
180
8. A person who commits the crime of unlawful use of
181
weapons under:
182
(1) Subdivision (2), (3), (4), or (11) of subsection 1
183
of this s ection shall be guilty of a class E felony;
184
(2) Subdivision (1), (6), (7), or (8) of subsection 1
185
of this s ection shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor,
186
except when a concealed weapon is carried onto any private
187
property whose owner has posted the premises as being off-
188
limits to concealed firearms by means of one or more signs
189
displayed in a conspicuous place of a minimum size of eleven
190
inches by fourteen inches with the writing thereon in
191
letters of not less than one inch, in which case the
192
penalties of subsection 2 of section 571.107 shall apply;

CCS SS SB 1421 94
193
(3) Subdivision (5) or (10) of subsection 1 of this
194
section s hall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the
195
firearm is unloaded and a class E felony if the firearm is
196
loaded;
197
(4) Subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of this section
198
shall be guilty of a class B felony, except that if the
199
violation of subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of this section
200
results in injury or death to another person, it is a class
201
A felony.
202
9. Violations of subdivision (9) of subsection 1 of
203
this se c tion shall be punished as follows:
204
(1) For the first violation a person shall be
205
sentence d to the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for
206
a class B felony;
207
(2) For any violation by a prior offender as defined
208
in secti o n 558.016, a person shall be sentenced to the
209
maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a class B felony
210
without the possibility of parole, probation or conditional
211
release for a term of ten years;
212
(3) For any violation by a persistent offender as
213
defined i n section 558.016, a person shall be sentenced to
214
the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a class B
215
felony without the possibility of parole, probation, or
216
conditional release;
217
(4) For any violation which results in injury or death
218
to anoth e r person, a person shall be sentenced to an
219
authorized disposition for a class A felony.
220
10. Any person knowingly aiding or abetting any other
221
person i n the violation of subdivision (9) of subsection 1
222
of this section shall be subject to the same penalty as that
223
prescribed by this section for violations by other persons.

CCS SS SB 1421 95
224
11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
225
person w h o pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a felony
226
violation of subsection 1 of this section shall receive a
227
suspended imposition of sentence if such person has
228
previously received a suspended imposition of sentence for
229
any other firearms- or weapons-related felony offense.
230
12. As used in this section "qualified retired peace
231
officer" means an individual who:
232
(1) Retired in good standing from service with a
233
public a g ency as a peace officer, other than for reasons of
234
mental instability;
235
(2) Before such retirement, was authorized by law to
236
engage i n or supervise the prevention, detection,
237
investigation, or prosecution of, or the incarceration of
238
any person for, any violation of law, and had statutory
239
powers of arrest;
240
(3) Before such retirement, was regularly employed as
241
a peace o fficer for an aggregate of fifteen years or more,
242
or retired from service with such agency, after completing
243
any applicable probationary period of such service, due to a
244
service-connected disability, as determined by such agency;
245
(4) Has a nonforfeitable right to benefits under the
246
retireme n t plan of the agency if such a plan is available;
247
(5) During the most recent twelve-month period, has
248
met, at t he expense of the individual, the standards for
249
training and qualification for active peace officers to
250
carry firearms;
251
(6) Is not under the influence of alcohol or another
252
intoxica t ing or hallucinatory drug or substance; and
253
(7) Is not prohibited by federal law from receiving a
254
firearm.

CCS SS SB 1421 96
255
13. The identification required by subdivision (1) of
256
subsecti o n 2 of this section is:
257
(1) A photographic identification issued by the agency
258
from whi c h the individual retired from service as a peace
259
officer that indicates that the individual has, not less
260
recently than one year before the date the individual is
261
carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or otherwise
262
found by the agency to meet the standards established by the
263
agency for training and qualification for active peace
264
officers to carry a firearm of the same type as the
265
concealed firearm; or
266
(2) A photographic identification issued by the agency
267
from whi c h the individual retired from service as a peace
268
officer; and
269
(3) A certification issued by the state in which the
270
individu a l resides that indicates that the individual has,
271
not less recently than one year before the date the
272
individual is carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or
273
otherwise found by the state to meet the standards
274
established by the state for training and qualification for
275
active peace officers to carry a firearm of the same type as
276
the concealed firearm.
1
577.800. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
2
use of unmann e d a i rcraft over an open-air facility or
3
critical infrastructure facility if he or she purposely:
4
(1) Operates an unmanned aircraft within a vertical
5
distance of four hundred feet from the ground and within the
6
property line of an open-air facility; [or]
7
(2) Uses an unmanned aircraft with the purpose of
8
deliveri n g to a person within an open-air facility any
9
object described in subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 4
10
of this section;

CCS SS SB 1421 97
11
(3) Uses an unmanned aircraft within the boundary of
12
any crit i cal infrastructure facility; or
13
(4) Operates an unmanned aircraft within a vertical
14
distance of four hundred feet from the ground and within the
15
property line of a critical infrastructure facility in
16
furtherance of any violation of criminal law.
17
2. For purposes of this section, "open-air facility"
18
shall m e an any sports, theater, music, performing arts, or
19
other entertainment facility with a capacity of five
20
[thousand] hundred people or more and not completely
21
enclosed by a roof or other structure. For purposes of this
22
section, "critical infrastructure faci l ity" shall have the
23
same meaning as section 569.086.
24
3. The provisions of this section shall not prohibit
25
the ope r ation of an unmanned aircraft by:
26
(1) An employee, owner, or operator of an open-air
27
facility [at the direction of the president or chief
28
executive officer of the open-air facility] or critical
29
infrastructure facility for the purpose of monitoring,
30
inspecting, operating, or maintaining the facility;
31
(2) A person who has written consent from the
32
presiden t or chief executive officer of the open-air
33
facility or critical infrastructure facility;
34
(3) An employee of a law enforcement agency, fire
35
departme n t, or emergency medical service in the exercise of
36
official duties;
37
(4) A government official or employee in the exercise
38
of offic i al duties;
39
(5) A public utility or a rural electric cooperative
40
if:
41
(a) The unmanned aircraft is used for the purpose of
42
inspecti n g, repairing, or maintaining utility transmission

CCS SS SB 1421 98
43
or distribution lines or other utility equipment or
44
infrastructure;
45
(b) The utility or cooperative notifies the open-air
46
facility or critical infrastructure facility before flying
47
the unmanned aircraft, except during an emergency; and
48
(c) The person operating the unmanned aircraft does
49
not phys i cally enter the prohibited space without an escort
50
provided by the open-air facility or critical infrastructure
51
facility; or
52
(6) An employee of a railroad in the exercise of
53
official duties on any land owned or operated by a railroad
54
corporation regulated by the Federal Railroad Administration.
55
4. The offense of unlawful use of unmanned aircraft
56
over an open-air facility or critical infrastructure
57
facility shall be punishable as an infraction unless the
58
person uses an unmanned aircraft for:
59
(1) Delivering a gun, knife, weapon, or other article,
60
includin g any explosive device or material, that may be used
61
in such manner to endanger the life of an employee or guest
62
at an open-air facility or critical infrastructure facility,
63
in which case the offense is a class B felony; or
64
(2) Delivering a controlled substance, as that term is
65
defined u nder section 195.010, in which case the offense is
66
a class D felony.
67
5. Each open-air facility or critical infrastructure
68
facilit y shall post a sign warning of the provisions of this
69
section. The sign shall be at least eleven inches by
70
fourteen inches and posted in a conspicuous place.
71
6. This section shall not apply to an operator of an
72
unmanne d aircraft that is being used for a commercial
73
purpose that is otherwise operating lawfully, provided the

CCS SS SB 1421 99
74
operator is authorized by the Federal Aviation
75
Administration to conduct lawful operations in that airspace.
1
579.022. 1. A person commits the offense of delivery
2
of a controll e d s u bstance causing death if a person delivers
3
or distributes a controlled substance under section 579.020
4
[knowing such substance is mixed with another controlled
5
substance] and a death results from the use of such
6
controlled substance.
7
2. It shall not be a defense that the user contributed
8
to the u ser's own death by using the controlled substance or
9
consenting to the administration of the controlled substance
10
by another.
11
3. The offense of delivery of a controlled substance
12
causing death is a class A felony.
13
4. For purposes of this section, "controlled
14
substan c e" means a Schedule I or Schedule II controlled
15
substance, as defined in section 195.017.
1
579.060. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
2
sale, distrib u tio n , or purchase of over-the-counter
3
methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly:
4
(1) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise
5
provides any number of packages of any drug product
6
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
7
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
8
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
9
total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams to the
10
same individual within a thirty-day period, unless the
11
amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed pursuant to a
12
valid prescription; or
13
(2) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within
14
a thirty - day period any number of packages of any drug
15
product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,

CCS SS SB 1421 100
16
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
17
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers in a
18
total amount greater than seven and two-tenths grams,
19
without regard to the number of transactions, unless the
20
amount is purchased, received, or acquired pursuant to a
21
valid prescription; or
22
(3) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within
23
a twenty - four-hour period any number of packages of any drug
24
product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
25
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
26
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers in a
27
total amount greater than three and six-tenths grams,
28
without regard to the number of transactions, unless the
29
amount is purchased, received, or acquired pursuant to a
30
valid prescription; or
31
(4) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise
32
provides any number of packages of any drug product
33
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
34
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
35
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
36
total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and two-
37
tenths grams to the same individual within a twelve-month
38
period, unless the amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed
39
pursuant to a valid prescription; or
40
(5) Purchases, receives, or otherwise acquires within
41
a twelve- month period any number of packages of any drug
42
product containing any detectable amount of ephedrine,
43
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
44
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers in a
45
total amount greater than [forty-three] sixty-one and two-
46
tenths grams, without regard to the number of transactions,

CCS SS SB 1421 101
47
unless the amount is purchased, received, or acquired
48
pursuant to a valid prescription; or
49
(6) Dispenses or offers drug products that are not
50
excluded from Schedule V in subsection 17 or 18 of section
51
195.017 and that contain detectable amounts of ephedrine,
52
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
53
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, without
54
ensuring that such products are located behind a pharmacy
55
counter where the public is not permitted and that such
56
products are dispensed by a registered pharmacist or
57
pharmacy technician under subsection 11 of section 195.017;
58
or
59
(7) Holds a retail sales license issued under chapter
60
144 and k nowingly sells or dispenses packages that do not
61
conform to the packaging requirements of section 195.418.
62
2. A pharmacist, intern pharmacist, or registered
63
pharmac y technician commits the offense of unlawful sale,
64
distribution, or purchase of over-the-counter
65
methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly:
66
(1) Sells, distributes, dispenses, or otherwise
67
provides any number of packages of any drug product
68
containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,
69
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
70
salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in a
71
total amount greater than three and six-tenth grams to the
72
same individual within a twenty-four hour period, unless the
73
amount is dispensed, sold, or distributed pursuant to a
74
valid prescription; or
75
(2) Fails to submit information under subsection 13 of
76
section 1 95.017 and subsection 6 of section 195.417 about
77
the sales of any compound, mixture, or preparation of
78
products containing detectable amounts of ephedrine,

CCS SS SB 1421 102
79
phenylpropanolamine, or pseudoephedrine, or any of their
80
salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, in
81
accordance with transmission methods and frequency
82
established by the department of health and senior services;
83
or
84
(3) Fails to implement and maintain an electronic log,
85
as requi r ed by subsection 12 of section 195.017, of each
86
transaction involving any detectable quantity of
87
pseudoephedrine, its salts, isomers, or salts of optical
88
isomers or ephedrine, its salts, optical isomers, or salts
89
of optical isomers; or
90
(4) Sells, distributes, dispenses or otherwise
91
provides to an individual under eighteen years of age
92
without a valid prescription any number of packages of any
93
drug product containing any detectable quantity of
94
pseudoephedrine, its salts, isomers, or salts of optical
95
isomers, or ephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or
96
salts of optical isomers.
97
3. Any person who violates the packaging requirements
98
of sect i on 195.418 and is considered the general owner or
99
operator of the outlet where ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
100
phenylpropanolamine products are available for sale shall
101
not be penalized if he or she documents that an employee
102
training program was in place to provide the employee who
103
made the unlawful retail sale with information on the state
104
and federal regulations regarding ephedrine,
105
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine.
106
4. A manufacturer commits the offense of unlawful
107
sale, d i stribution, or purchase of over-the-counter
108
methamphetamine precursor drugs if he or she knowingly fails
109
to pay the fees required under subsection 7 of section
110
195.417.

CCS SS SB 1421 103
111
5. The offense of unlawful sale, distribution, or
112
purchas e of over-the-counter methamphetamine precursor drugs
113
is a class A misdemeanor.
1
579.065. 1. A person commits the offense of
2
trafficking d r ugs in the first degree if, except as
3
authorized by this chapter or chapter 195, such person
4
knowingly distributes, delivers, manufactures, produces or
5
attempts to distribute, deliver, manufacture or produce:
6
(1) More than thirty grams of a mixture or substance
7
containi n g a detectable amount of heroin;
8
(2) More than one hundred fifty grams of a mixture or
9
substanc e containing a detectable amount of coca leaves,
10
except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which
11
cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their
12
salts have been removed; cocaine salts and their optical and
13
geometric isomers, and salts of isomers; ecgonine, its
14
derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or
15
any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any
16
quantity of any of the foregoing substances;
17
(3) More than five hundred milligrams of a mixture or
18
substanc e containing a detectable amount of lysergic acid
19
diethylamide (LSD);
20
(4) More than thirty grams of a mixture or substance
21
containi n g a detectable amount of phencyclidine (PCP);
22
(5) More than four grams of phencyclidine;
23
(6) More than thirty kilograms of a mixture or
24
substanc e containing marijuana;
25
(7) More than thirty grams of any material, compound,
26
mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of the
27
following substances having a stimulant effect on the
28
central nervous system: amphetamine, its salts, optical
29
isomers and salts of it s optical isomers; methamphetamine,

CCS SS SB 1421 104
30
its salts, optical isomers and salts of its optical isomers;
31
phenmetrazine and its salts; or methylphenidate;
32
(8) More than thirty grams of any material, compound,
33
mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of 3,4-
34
methylenedioxymethamphetamine;
35
(9) One gram or more of flunitrazepam for the first
36
offense;
37
(10) Any amount of gamma-hydroxybutyric acid for the
38
first off e nse; [or]
39
(11) More than [ten] three milligrams of fentanyl [or
40
carfentan i l], or any derivative thereof, [or any combination
41
thereof,] or any compound, mixture, or substance containing
42
a detectable amount of fentanyl [or carfentanil], or [their]
43
its optical isomers or analogues; or
44
(12) Any amount of carfentanil.
45
2. T h e offense of trafficking drugs in the first
46
degree i s a class B felony.
47
3. The offense of trafficking drugs in the first
48
degree i s a class A felony if the quantity involved is:
49
(1) Ninety grams or more of a mixture or substance
50
containi n g a detectable amount of heroin; or
51
(2) Four hundred fifty grams or more of a mixture or
52
substanc e containing a detectable amount of coca leaves,
53
except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which
54
cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their
55
salts have been removed; cocaine salts and their optical and
56
geometric isomers, and salts of isomers; ecgonine, its
57
derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or
58
any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any
59
quantity of any of the foregoing substances; or

CCS SS SB 1421 105
60
(3) One gram or more of a mixture or substance
61
containi n g a detectable amount of lysergic acid diethylamide
62
(LSD); or
63
(4) Ninety grams or more of a mixture or substance
64
containi n g a detectable amount of phencyclidine (PCP); or
65
(5) Twelve grams or more of phencyclidine; or
66
(6) One hundred kilograms or more of a mixture or
67
substanc e containing marijuana; or
68
(7) Ninety grams or more of any material, compound,
69
mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of the
70
following substances having a stimulant effect on the
71
central nervous system: amphetamine, its salts, optical
72
isomers and salts of it s optical isomers; methamphetamine,
73
its salts, optical isomers and salts of its optical isomers;
74
phenmetrazine and its salts; or methylphenidate; or
75
(8) More than thirty grams of any material, compound,
76
mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of the
77
following substances having a stimulant effect on the
78
central nervous system: amphetamine, its salts, optical
79
isomers, and salts of i t s optical isomers; methamphetamine,
80
its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical
81
isomers; phenmetrazine and its salts; or methylphenidate,
82
and the location of the offense was within two thousand feet
83
of real property comprising a public or private elementary,
84
vocational, or secondary school, college, community college,
85
university, or any school bus, in or on the real property
86
comprising public housing or any other governmental assisted
87
housing, or within a motor vehicle, or in any structure or
88
building which contains rooms furnished for the
89
accommodation or lodging of guests, and kept, used,
90
maintained, advertised, or held out to the public as a place

CCS SS SB 1421 106
91
where sleeping accommodations are sought for pay or
92
compensation to transient guests or permanent guests; or
93
(9) Ninety grams or more of any material, compound,
94
mixture o r preparation which contains any quantity of 3,4-
95
methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
96
(10) More than thirty grams of any material, compound,
97
mixture, o r preparation which contains any quantity of 3,4-
98
methylenedioxymethamphetamine and the location of the
99
offense was within two thousand feet of real property
100
comprising a public or private elementary, vocational, or
101
secondary school, college, community college, university, or
102
any school bus, in or on the real property comprising public
103
housing or any other governmental assisted housing, within a
104
motor vehicle, or in any structure or building which
105
contains rooms furnished for the accommodation or lodging of
106
guests, and kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out
107
to the public as a place where sleeping accommodations are
108
sought for pay or compensation to transient guests or
109
permanent guests; or
110
(11) One gram or more of flunitrazepam for a second or
111
subsequen t offense; or
112
(12) Any amount of gamma-hydroxybutyric acid for a
113
second or subsequent offense; or
114
(13) [Twenty] Fourteen milligrams or more of fentanyl
115
[or carfe n tanil], or any derivative thereof, [or any
116
combination thereof,] or any compound, mixture, or substance
117
containing a detectable amount of fentanyl [or carfentanil],
118
or [their] its optical isomers or analogues; or
119
(14) More than five hundredths of a milligram of
120
carfentani l.
1
579.068. 1. A person commits the offense of
2
trafficking d r ugs in the second degree if, except as

CCS SS SB 1421 107
3
authorized by this chapter or chapter 195, such person
4
knowingly possesses or has under his or her control,
5
purchases or attempts to purchase, or brings into this state:
6
(1) More than thirty grams of a mixture or substance
7
containi n g a detectable amount of heroin;
8
(2) More than one hundred fifty grams of a mixture or
9
substanc e containing a detectable amount of coca leaves,
10
except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which
11
cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their
12
salts have been removed; cocaine salts and their optical and
13
geometric isomers, and salts of isomers; ecgonine, its
14
derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or
15
any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any
16
quantity of any of the foregoing substances;
17
(3) More than five hundred milligrams of a mixture or
18
substanc e containing a detectable amount of lysergic acid
19
diethylamide (LSD);
20
(4) More than thirty grams of a mixture or substance
21
containi n g a detectable amount of phencyclidine (PCP);
22
(5) More than four grams of phencyclidine;
23
(6) More than thirty kilograms of a mixture or
24
substanc e containing marijuana;
25
(7) More than thirty grams of any material, compound,
26
mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of the
27
following substances having a stimulant effect on the
28
central nervous system: amphetamine, its salts, optical
29
isomers and salts of it s optical isomers; methamphetamine,
30
its salts, optical isomers and salts of its optical isomers;
31
phenmetrazine and its salts; or methylphenidate;
32
(8) More than thirty grams of any material, compound,
33
mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of 3,4-
34
methylenedioxymethamphetamine; [or]

CCS SS SB 1421 108
35
(9) More than [ten] three milligrams of fentanyl [or
36
carfenta n il], or any derivative thereof, [or any combination
37
thereof,] or any compound, mixture, or substance containing
38
a detectable amount of fentanyl [or carfentanil], or [their]
39
its optical isomers or analogues; or
40
(10) Any amount of carfentanil.
41
2. T h e offense of trafficking drugs in the second
42
degree i s a class C felony.
43
3. The offense of trafficking drugs in the second
44
degree i s a class B felony if the quantity involved is:
45
(1) Ninety grams or more of a mixture or substance
46
containi n g a detectable amount of heroin; or
47
(2) Four hundred fifty grams or more of a mixture or
48
substanc e containing a detectable amount of coca leaves,
49
except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which
50
cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their
51
salts have been removed; cocaine salts and their optical and
52
geometric isomers, and salts of isomers; ecgonine, its
53
derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or
54
any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any
55
quantity of any of the foregoing substances; or
56
(3) One gram or more of a mixture or substance
57
containi n g a detectable amount of lysergic acid diethylamide
58
(LSD); or
59
(4) Ninety grams or more of a mixture or substance
60
containi n g a detectable amount of phencyclidine (PCP); or
61
(5) Twelve grams or more of phencyclidine; or
62
(6) One hundred kilograms or more of a mixture or
63
substanc e containing marijuana; or
64
(7) More than five hundred marijuana plants; or
65
(8) Ninety grams or more but less than four hundred
66
fifty gr a ms of any material, compound, mixture, or

CCS SS SB 1421 109
67
preparation containing any quantity of the following
68
substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous
69
system: amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers and salts
70
of its o ptical isomers; methamphetamine, its salts, optical
71
isomers and salts of its optical isomers; phenmetrazine and
72
its salts; or methylphenidate; or
73
(9) Ninety grams or more but less than four hundred
74
fifty gr a ms of any material, compound, mixture, or
75
preparation which contains any quantity of 3,4-
76
methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
77
(10) [Twenty] Fourteen milligrams or more of fentanyl
78
[or carfe n tanil], or any derivative thereof, [or any
79
combination thereof,] or any compound, mixture, or substance
80
containing a detectable amount of fentanyl [or carfentanil],
81
or [their] its optical isomers or analogues; or
82
(11) More than five hundredths of a milligram of
83
carfentan i l.
84
4. The offense of trafficking drugs in the second
85
degree i s a class A felony if the quantity involved is four
86
hundred fifty grams or more of any material, compound,
87
mixture or preparation which contains:
88
(1) Any quantity of the following substances having a
89
stimulan t effect on the central nervous system:
90
amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers and salt s of its
91
optical isomers; methamphetamine, its salts, isomers and
92
salts of its isomers; phenmetrazine and its salts; or
93
methylphenidate; or
94
(2) Any quantity of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine.
95
5. T he offense of drug trafficking in the second
96
degree i s a class C felony for the first offense and a class
97
B felony for any second or subsequent offense for the
98
trafficking of less than one gram of flunitrazepam.

CCS SS SB 1421 110
1
589.900. 1. For the purposes of sections 589.900 to
2
589.902, the f oll o wing terms mean:
3
(1) "Authorized individuals", peace officers, as
4
defined i n section 590.010, who are certified in accordance
5
with federal requirements, including the Homeland Security
6
Act of 2002, Pub. L. 107-296, as amended, when applicable,
7
to conduct unmanned aircraft and unmanned aerial system
8
mitigation;
9
(2) "Mitigate", any of the following actions:
10
(a) During the operation of an unmanned aircraft
11
system, t o detect, identify, monitor, or track the unmanned
12
aircraft system or unmanned aircraft, without prior consent,
13
including by means of intercept or other access of a wire
14
communication, an oral communication, or an electronic
15
communication used to control the unmanned aircraft system
16
or unmanned aircraft;
17
(b) To warn the operator of the unmanned aircraft
18
system o r unmanned aircraft, including by passive or active
19
and direct or indirect physical, electronic, radio, or
20
electromagnetic means, or through the use of remote
21
identification broadcast or other means;
22
(c) To disrupt control of the unmanned aircraft system
23
or unman n ed aircraft, without prior consent, including by
24
disabling the unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft
25
by intercepting, interfering, or causing interference with
26
wire, oral, electronic, or radio communications used to
27
control the unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft;
28
(d) To seize or exercise control of the unmanned
29
aircraft system or unmanned aircraft; or
30
(e) To use reasonable force, if necessary, to disable,
31
damage, o r destroy the unmanned aircraft system or unmanned
32
aircraft.

CCS SS SB 1421 111
33
2. The terms "unmanned aircraft" and "unmanned
34
aircraf t system" shall have the meanings given such terms in
35
49 U.S.C. Section 44801.
1
589.902. 1. To the greatest extent permissible under
2
applicable fe d era l law, including the Homeland Security Act
3
of 2002, Pub. L. 107-296, as amended, authorized individuals
4
in this state shall be empowered to take necessary action to
5
mitigate a credible threat that an unmanned aircraft or
6
unmanned aircraft system poses to the safety or security of
7
people, facilities, assets, a venue or set of venues used
8
for large-scale public gatherings or events, critical
9
infrastructure, or correctional facilities.
10
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit
11
the pow e r of a law enforcement officer in this state to
12
seize an unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft in
13
the course of their duties. A law enforcement officer may
14
use all lawful means to effe ct such a seizure, which may
15
include the use of mitigation techniques where permissible.
16
3. Any unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft
17
seized u nder this section or in connection with a criminal
18
act shall be subject to forfeiture under section 513.607.
19
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
20
permit t he jamming of or interference with any signal,
21
except in accordance with all applicable federal laws,
22
rules, and regulations, including, but not limited to, the
23
Homeland Security Act of 2002, Pub. L. 107-296, as amended.
1
590.1300. 1. The POST commission shall establish a
2
training progra m t o be known as the "Missouri Rangers", and
3
shall establish minimum standards for training instructors,
4
training centers, and training programs that focus on
5
preventing and responding to emergency or violent crisis
6
situations in school settings.

CCS SS SB 1421 112
7
2. (1) Each person seeking entrance into the Missouri
8
rangers trai n ing program shall submit an authorization for a
9
criminal history background check to include the records of
10
the Federal Bureau of Investigation to the training center
11
or training program where such person is seeking entrance.
12
The training center or training program shall cause a
13
criminal history background check to be made and shall cause
14
the resulting report to be forwarded to the agency where the
15
applicant is seeking to be designated as a Missouri ranger.
16
(2) After a person has submitted an application, but
17
prior to entry to the training program, each applicant shall
18
take a physical fitness test:
19
(a) For applicants aged twenty-one to thirty-five:
20
a. R un one and one-half miles in less than twelve
21
minutes and thirty seconds;
22
b. Complete a minimum of four pull-ups;
23
c. Complete a minimum of forty pushups in less than
24
one min u te; and
25
d. Complete fifty crunches in less than one minute;
26
(b ) The POST commission shall promulgate lower age-
27
appropri a te standards for applicants aged thirty-six to
28
forty-five and for applicants over the age of forty-six;
29
(3) No former or retired military personnel shall be
30
admitted to a Missouri ranger training center or training
31
program unless such person has received an honorable
32
discharge.
33
3. The arrest powers granted to any person who
34
success f ully completes the Missouri rangers training program
35
shall be limited to:
36
(1) Missouri rangers who are actively employed by the
37
school o r school district;

CCS SS SB 1421 113
38
(2) Any property or premises owned, leased, rented, or
39
possesse d by the school or school district, including any
40
school bus owned, operated, or contracted for in the service
41
on behalf of the district while involved in school
42
activities; and
43
(3) Offenses established under chapter 571 and any
44
offense u nder section 569.140 or 569.155 involving school
45
property.
46
The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any
47
pers on who is a n a ctive law enforc ement offi cer.
48
4 . (1 ) The POST c omm ission shall develop a training
49
program of n o t more than one hundred sixty hours that shall
50
include close quarter combat; building security and
51
hardening; bomb and arson; de-escalation; implicit and
52
racial bias; active shooter training; preventative
53
behavioral threat assessments; state and federal
54
constitutional and statutory law relating to search and
55
seizure, as relating to the arrests Missouri rangers are
56
permitted to make; firearms training; defensive tactics; an
57
abbreviated "stop the bleed" first aid training; and any
58
other related training deemed necessary by POST.
59
(2) The POST commission shall promulgate an
60
abbrevia t ed training program for applicants that are active
61
or retired law enforcement officers, or active or retired
62
military personnel, including active or retired members of
63
the National Guard. As used in this section, "retired"
64
shall mean any law e nforcement officer with ten or more
65
years of experience.
66
5. The POST commission shall promulgate rules for
67
continu i ng education training for all Missouri rangers. Any
68
rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in

CCS SS SB 1421 114
69
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
70
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
71
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
72
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
73
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if a ny of the
74
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
75
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
76
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
77
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
78
or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
79
6. The POST commission may develop a part-time
80
trainin g program, provided such program satisfies all of the
81
requirements of this section.
82
7. A certificate of Missouri ranger training program
83
complet i on may be issued to any applicant by any approved
84
Missouri ranger training instructor. On the certificate of
85
program completion, the approved Mis s ouri ranger training
86
instructor shall affirm that the individual receiving
87
instruction has taken and passed a Missouri ranger training
88
program that meets the requirements of this section. The
89
instructor shall also provide a copy of such certifi c ate to
90
the director of the department of public safety.
91
8. Upon successful completion of the training program,
92
each pe r son shall receive a certificate and a Missouri
93
ranger badge.
94
9. The front and back of the outermost garment of the
95
ranger u niform shall have capitalized block letters spelling
96
"RANGER".
97
10. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections
98
6 and 7 o f se c tion 160.665, subdivision (10) of subsection 1
99
of section 571.030, subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of
100
section 571.107, or any other provision of law to the

CCS SS SB 1421 115
101
contrary, a Missouri ranger may, if authorized by the hiring
102
school or school district, carry a firearm or firearms,
103
whether loaded or unloaded, or any other weapon readily
104
capable of lethal use into the school, onto any school bus
105
owned, operated, or contracted for by the school or school
106
district, or onto any property or premises owned, leased,
107
rented, or possessed by the school or school district;
108
(2) It shall be the decision of the hiring school or
109
school d i strict whether a ranger shall carry a firearm or
110
firearms or any other weapon readily capable of lethal use
111
as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection while on
112
duty, which type of firearm or firearms or any other weapon
113
the ranger shall carry, and whether the firearm, firearms,
114
or weapons shall be concealed;
115
(3) Each ranger shall use a level three retention
116
holster i f open carrying a pistol while on duty.
117
11. For the purpose of liability and workers'
118
compensa t ion only, Missouri rangers shall be considered
119
employees of the school or school district that hires them.
120
All other benefits for which an employee of the school or
121
school district may be eligible, such as health and
122
retirement benefits, may be offered to the ranger at the
123
discretion of the school or school district. Rangers
124
employed by a school or school district may b e compensated
125
as full- or part-time employees, or on a volunteer basis
126
without compensation. Qualified immunity and the public
127
duty rule shall apply to the provisions of this section as
128
interpreted by the federal and state courts.
1
610.141. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
2
following ter m s s h all mean:

CCS SS SB 1421 116
3
(1) "Case record", all records in a case file in the
4
statewid e court automation system relating to an eligible
5
offense;
6
(2) "Criminal history record information", data
7
relating to the arrest, prosecution, court action,
8
detention, and other related information collected, stored,
9
and disseminated by the central repository for each criminal
10
offense in this state;
11
(3) "Eligible offense", for an offense to be eligible,
12
it must:
13
(a) Be a qualifying offense, as defined in this
14
section;
15
(b) Be a final conviction;
16
(c) Be the only charge of conviction in a case or part
17
of a cas e that contains only convictions for qualifying
18
offenses;
19
(d) Have been one year since final disposition of the
20
eligible offense for a misdemeanor and three years for a
21
felony;
22
(e) Be an offender with no conviction for a
23
misdemea n or or felony within one calendar year of the final
24
disposition of the expungable offense if the offense is a
25
misdemeanor and three years if the expungable offense is a
26
felony, not including violations of the traffic regulations
27
provided under chapters 301, 302, 303, 304, and 307;
28
(f) Be an offender with no outstanding arrest or
29
pending c harges for a misdemeanor or felony at the time of
30
analysis for expungement, not including violations of the
31
traffic regulations provided under chapters 301, 302, 303,
32
304, and 307; and
33
(g) Not be for a class A felony;

CCS SS SB 1421 117
34
(4) "Expungement", closure of the record pursuant to
35
section 6 10.120;
36
(5) "Final disposition", completion of all court
37
imposed t erms and conditions and unconditional release from
38
custody;
39
(6) "Qualifying offense", a conviction for:
40
(a) Possession of a controlled substance under section
41
195.202, as it existed prior to January 1, 2017;
42
(b) Unlawful use of drug paraphernalia under section
43
195.233, as it existed prior to January 1, 2017;
44
(c) Possession or control of a controlled substance
45
under se c tion 579.015; or
46
(d) Unlawful possession of drug paraphernalia under
47
section 5 79.074;
48
(7) "Restoration of rights", a full restoration of the
49
civil ri g hts of such person to the status occupied prior to
50
the conviction as if such events had never taken place.
51
This includes the right to vote, the right to hold public
52
office, and to serve as a juror. No person with a state-
53
initiated expungement shall be h e ld thereafter under any
54
provision of law to be guilty of perjury or otherwise giving
55
a false statement by reason of his or her failure to recite
56
or acknowledge such convictions or expungement in response
57
to an inquiry and no such inquiry shall be made for
58
information relating to an expungement, except the
59
petitioner shall disclose the expunged offense to any entity
60
with authorization to access closed records under section
61
610.120. The expunged offense may be considered a prior
62
offense in determining a sentence to be imposed for any
63
subsequent offense that the person is found guilty of
64
committing. "Restoration of rights" shall not include

CCS SS SB 1421 118
65
rights related to the uses for the conviction detailed in
66
section 610.120.
67
2. All eligible offenses shall automatically be
68
expunge d as a matter of law upon eligibility. The
69
provisions of this section shall apply retroa c tively to any
70
arrest, charge, trial, or conviction for which there is an
71
electronic record regardless of the date that the arrest was
72
made, the charge or charges were brought, the trial
73
occurred, or the conviction was entered. The result of the
74
expungement shall be a closure of the re c ord and restoration
75
of rights, as defined in this section.
76
3. The central repository shall, on a rolling basis,
77
but not less than once per week, automatically screen
78
criminal history record information contained in the
79
statewide criminal history database for eligible offenses.
80
All eligible offenses shall be automatically expunged by t h e
81
central repository pursuant to this section. The central
82
repository shall base automated expungement r ecord
83
designations only on the data available in its system. Once
84
expunged, an offense record status shall reflect the
85
expungement in the criminal history system by way of the
86
Missouri uniform law enforcement system. If additional
87
information is learned by the central re p ository relating to
88
eligibility, the analysis may be rerun as necessary and the
89
record status updated. The central repository shall, on at
90
least a weekly basis, s end the supreme court of Missouri a
91
list of all expunged offense changes since the previous
92
report.
93
4. Upon completion of each expungement eligibility
94
analysi s or upon any update of record status under
95
subsection 3 of this section, the central repository shall
96
notify the office of state courts administrator of its

CCS SS SB 1421 119
97
designations of automated expungement eligible offenses, in
98
a manner to be determined by the office of state courts
99
administrator and the state highway patrol. Case records
100
for eligible offenses contained within the s tatewide court
101
automation system shall be confidential and available to the
102
parties or as otherwise provided by supreme court rules.
103
The office of state courts administrator shall expunge c a se
104
records for eligible offenses based only on the information
105
available in the statewide court automation system and the
106
designations of eligible offenses provided by the central
107
repository.
108
5. For purposes of compliance with this section, any
109
agency r eleasing investigative reports under chapter 610
110
shall treat said information as a closed record where it
111
relates only to an expunged offense under this section. It
112
shall be an affirmative defense that an agency conducte d a
113
Missouri uniform law enforcement system query of the
114
relevant criminal history record and adhered to the record
115
status designation therein.
116
6. An offender shall be limited to three misdemeanor
117
and two felony expungements under this section and section
118
610.140 combined. Where a criminal case contains more than
119
one expungable of f ense, the offense with the highest level
120
penalty available shall be the only offense that counts for
121
the purposes of this subsection.
122
7. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the filing
123
of an e x pungement petition under any other provision of law
124
for which such a filing is permissible.
125
8. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
126
sole re m edy for relief for failure to expunge under this
127
section shall be the filing of an expungement petition under
128
section 610.140.

CCS SS SB 1421 120
129
9. Beginning January 1, 2028, and each year
130
thereaf t er, the Missouri state highway patrol shall submit a
131
report to the joint committee on the justice system, the
132
house judiciary committee or any successor committee, and
133
the senate judiciary and civil and criminal jurisprudence
134
committee or any successor committee providing statistical
135
information for the prior year, arranged by judicial circuit
136
and county, of the number of expungements issued under
137
section 610.141 in the criminal history system. The data
138
shall be aggregated by race, sex, age, circuit, county, and
139
offense type and level if such data is available.
140
10. The provisions of this section shall be effective
141
when tec h nically feasible for both the office of state
142
courts administrator and the central repository, but no
143
later than January 1, 2027.
144
11. Notwithstanding section 610.120, upon request, the
145
Missouri state highway patrol shall provide a consumer
146
reporting agency with information sufficient to accurately
147
identify and delete records associated with all offenses
148
being expunged under this section. Consumer reporting
149
agencies shall sign an agreement w h ich certifies they will
150
only use the data provided for the purpose of compliance
151
with this chapter and that when no longer needed, all such
152
data will be destroyed.
153
12. The office of state courts administrator, the
154
departme n t of corrections, and the Missouri state highway
155
patrol shall jointly develop a document outlining the
156
state's expungement provisions under this section which
157
shall be provided by:
158
(1) Any court sentencing an individual for a
159
qualifyi n g offense under this section at the time of
160
sentencing; or

CCS SS SB 1421 121
161
(2) Any probation or parole officer releasing an
162
individu a l from supervision for a qualifying offense under
163
this section.
1
610.143. 1. Records of arrests, indictments pending
2
trial, and co n vic t ions of crimes shall no longer be reported
3
if at any time after a conviction it is learned that a full
4
pardon or expungement has been granted for that conviction,
5
or at any time after an arrest or indictment it is learned
6
that a conviction did not result.
7
2. In addition to such other remedies as are provided
8
in this section, if the attorney general has reason to
9
believe that any person has violated or is violating this
10
section, the attorney general:
11
(1) May bring an action to enjoin such violation in
12
any appr o priate United States district court or in any other
13
court of competent jurisdiction;
14
(2) May bring an action on behalf of the residents of
15
the stat e to recover:
16
(a) Damages for which the person is liable to such
17
resident s under Sections 616 and 617 of 15 U.S.C. Section
18
1681s as a result of the violation;
19
(b) In the case of a violation described in any of
20
Paragrap h s (1) through (3) of Section 623(c) of 15 U.S.C.
21
Section 1681s, damages for which the person would, but for
22
Section 623(c), be liable to such residents as a result of
23
the violation; or
24
(c) Damages of not more than one thousand dollars for
25
each wil l ful or negligent violation; and
26
(3) In the case of any successful action under
27
subdivis i on (1) or (2) of this subsection, shall be awarded

CCS SS SB 1421 122
28
the costs of the action and reasonable attorney fees as
29
determined by the court.
30
3. Injunctive relief shall be available to any
31
consume r aggrieved by a violation or a threatened violation
32
of this section regardless of whether the consumer seeks any
33
other remedy under this section.
34
4. An employer, volunteer organization, or landlord
35
who emp l oys, qualifies, or otherwise engages an individual
36
whose criminal history record has been expunged shall be
37
immune from liability for any claim arising out of the
38
misconduct of the individual if the misconduct relates to
39
the portion of the criminal history record that has been
40
expunged, unless such employer, volunteer organization, or
41
landlord failed to exercise reasonable care in determining
42
that the employee does not pose a danger or risk to others.
43
5. A person granted an expungement shall disclose any
44
expunge d offense if the disclosure of such information is
45
necessary to complete any application for employment with
46
any:
47
(1) Federally insured bank or savings institution or
48
credit u n ion or an affiliate of such institution or credit
49
union for the purpose of compliance with 12 U.S.C. Section
50
1829 and 12 U.S.C. Section 1785;
51
(2) Entity engaged in the business of insurance or any
52
insurer f or the purpose of complying with 18 U.S.C. Section
53
1033, 18 U.S.C. Section 1034, or other similar law that
54
requires an employer engaged in the business of insurance to
55
exclude applicants with certain criminal convictions from
56
employment; or

CCS SS SB 1421 123
57
(3) Entity authorized to receive and utilize closed
58
criminal history records under section 610.120, including
59
but not limited to law enforcement.
1
610.144. 1. (1) There is hereby created in the state
2
treasury the " Mis s ouri Expungement Fund", which shall
3
consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly
4
and gifts, donations, grants, and bequests. The state
5
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. I n accordance
6
with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the stat e treasurer may
7
approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund
8
and, upon appropriation , moneys in this fund shall be used
9
solely as provided in subsection 2 of this section.
10
(2) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
11
fund in t he same manner as other funds are invested. Any
12
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
13
credited to the fund.
14
2. The office of state courts administrator and the
15
departm e nt of public safety shall expend moneys from the
16
fund, upon appropriation, on the statewide court automation
17
case management system and the Missouri criminal history
18
record information system established under sections 43.500
19
to 43.530 for one or more of the following purposes:
20
(1) Expenses that may be incurred to develop,
21
establis h , maintain, or operate any information technology
22
equipment, software, systems, or services associated with
23
the expungement or closing of records under Missouri law,
24
including the development and implementation of any
25
technology-assisted, state-initiated bulk expungement or
26
sealing of records under Missouri law; or
27
(2) The cost of necessary personnel or contractors.

CCS SS SB 1421 124
1
650.240. The director shall employ deputy inspectors
2
who shall be r esponsible to the chief inspector [and who
3
shall have had at the time of appointment not less than five
4
years' experience in the construction, installation,
5
inspection, operation, maintenance, or repair of high
6
pressure boilers and pressure vessels as a mechanical
7
engineer, steam operating engineer, boilermaker, or boiler
8
inspector, and who shall have passed the examination
9
provided for in section 650.250].
1
Section B. Because immediate action is necessary to
2
address the urg e nt need of Missouri law enforcement agencies
3
to be able to ensure and provide for the safety and security
4
of Missouri residents from the threat that weaponized
5
unmanned aircraft systems present to Missouri, the enactment
6
of sections 589.900 and 589.902 and the repeal and
7
reenactment of section 577.800 of this act are deemed
8
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
9
health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared
10
to be an emergency act within the meaning of the
11
constitution, and the enactment of sections 589.900 and
12
589.902 and the repeal and reenactment of section 577.800 of
13
this act shall be in full force and effect upon its passage
14
and approval.
1
Section C. In the event that any section, provision,
2
clause, phrase, or word of this act or the application
3
thereof is declared invalid under the Constitution of the
4
United States or the Constitution of the State of Missouri,
5
whether on procedural or substantive grounds, it is the
6
intent of the general assembly that the remaining sections
7
of this act remain in force and effect as far as they are
8
capable of being carried into execution as intended by the

CCS SS SB 1421 125
9
general assembly. The general assembly hereby declares that
10
it would have pas s ed each section, provision, clause,
11
phrase, or word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any
12
one or more sections, provisions, clauses, phrases, or words
13
of this act or the application of this act would be declared
14
unenforceable, unconstitutional, or invalid.
